[4501]
It has been narrated through a different chain of transmitters on the authority of Hasan who said: Ibn, Ziyad paid a visit to Ma'qil b. Yasir who was seriously ill. Here follows the same tradition as has gone before with the addition that Ibn Ziyad asked: Why didn't you narrate this tradition to me before this day? Ma'qil reprimanded him and said: I did not narrate it to you or I was not going to narrate it to you.
[4502]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Malik that Ubaidullah b. Ziyad visited Ma'qil b. Yaser in the latter's illness. Ma'qil said to him: I am narrating to you a tradition. If I were not at death's door, I would not narrate it to you. I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) say: A ruler who, having obtained control over the affairs of the Muslims, does not strive for their betterment and does not serve them sincerely shall not enter Paradise with them.
[4503]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu al-Aswad who said: My father related to me that Ma'qil b. Yasir fell ill. 'Ubaidullah b. Ziyad called on him to inquire after his health. Here follows the tradition as narrated by Hasan from Ma'qil.
[4504]
It has been narrated on the authority of Hasan that A'idh b. 'Amr who was one of the Companions of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) called on 'Ubaidullah b. Ziyad and said (to him) : O my son, I have heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: The worst of guardians is the cruel ruler. Beware of being one of them. Ubaidullah said (to him out of arrogance): Sit you down. You are from the chaff of the Companions of Muhammad (may peace be upon him). A'idh said: Was there worthless chaff among them? Such worthless chaff appeared after them and among other people.
[4505]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira who said: One day the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stood among us (to deliver a sermon). He talked about the misappropriation of booty, and declared it to be a serious matter and a grave sin. Then he said: I shouldn't find that any of you should come on the Day of Judgment with a growling camel mounted on his neck, and should appeal to me for help saying: "Messenger of Allah, help me." and I should say: I have no authority to help you; I already communicated to you. I shouldn't find that any of you should come on the Day of Judgment with a bleating ewe mounted on his neck, and he should say to me: "Messenger of Allah, help me," and I should say: I have no authority to help you; I conveyed to you. I shouldn't find that one of you should come on the Day of Judgment with a Person crying loudly mounted on his neck, and he should say to me: "Messenger of Allah, help me," and I should say: I have no authority to help you; I conveyed to you. I shouldn't find that any one of you should come on the Day of Judgment with fluttering clothes wrapped round his neck and he should say to me: "Messenger of Allah, help me," and I should say: I have no authority to help you; I conveyed to you. I shouldn't find that any of you should come on the Day of Judgment with a heap of gold and silver placed on his neck and he should say to me: "Messenger of Allah, help me." and I should say: I have no authority to help you; I already conveyed to you (the warning from the Almighty).
[4506]
The above tradition has been narrated on the same authority through different chains of transmitters.
[4507]
Abu Huraira has narrated this hadith with a slight variation of words.
[4508]
Abu Huraira has narrated this hadith similar to the above mentioned hadith.
[4509]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Humaid as-Sa'idi who said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) appointed a man from the Asad tribe who was called Ibn Lutbiyya in charge of Sadaqa (i.e. authorised hign to receive Sadaqa from the people on behalf of the State. When he returned (with the collictions), he said: This is for you and (this is mine as) it was presented to me as a gift. The narrator said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upod him) stood on the pulpit and praised God and extolled Him. Then he said: What about a State official whom I give an assignment and who (comes and) says: This is for you and this has been presented to me as a gift? Why didn't he remain in the house of his father or the house of his mother so that he could observe whether gifts were presented to him or not. By the Being in Whose Hand is the life of Muhammad, any one of you will not take anything from it but will bring it on the Day of Judgment, carrying on his neck a camel that will be growling, or a cow that will be bellowing or an ewe that will be bleating. Then he raised his hands so that we could see the whiteness of his armpits. Then he said twice: O God, I have conveyed (Thy Commandments).
[4510]
It has been reported on the authority of Abu Humaid as-Sa'idi who said: The Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) appointed Ibn Lutbiyya, a man from the Azd tribe, in charge of Sadaqa (authorising him to receive gifts from the people on behalf of the State). He came with the collectio, gave it to the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him). and said: This wealth is for you and this is a gift presented to me. The Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) said to him: Why didn't you remain in the house of your father and your mother to see whether gifts were presented to you or not. Then he stood up to deliver a sermon. Here follows the tradition like the tradition of Sufyan.
[4511]
It has been reported on the authority of Abu Humaid as-Sa'idi who said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) appointed a man from the Azd tribe. called Ibn al-,Utbiyya, in charge of Sadaqat to be received from Banu Sulaim. When he came (back), the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) asked him to render his account. He said: This wealth is for you (i.e. for the public treasury) and this is a gift (presented to me). The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: You should have remained in the house of your father and your mother, until your gift came to you if you spoke the truth; then he addressed us. He praised God and extolled Him, and afterwards said: I appoint a man from you to a responsible post sharing with the authority that God has entrusted to me, and he comes to me saying: This wealth is for you (i.e. for the public treasury) and this is a gift presented to me. Why did he not remain in the house of his father and his mother and his gift came to him, if he was truthful? By God, any one of you will not take anything from (the public funds) without any justification, but will meet his Lord carrying it on himself on the Day of judgment. I will recognise any one of you meeting Allah and carrying a growling camel, or a cow bellowing or a goat bleating. Then he raised his hands so high that whiteness of his armpits could be seen. Then he said: O my Lord, I have conveyed (Thy Commandments). The narrator says: My eyes saw (the Holy Prophet standing in that pose) and my ears heard (what he said).
[4512]
This tradition has been hanoed down through a different chain of transmitters on the authority of Hisham with aslight variation in the wording.
[4513]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Humaid as-Sa'idi that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) appointed a man in charge of Sadaqa (authorising him to receive charity from the people on behalf of the State). He came (back to the Holy prophet) with a large number of things and started saying: This is for you and this has been presented to me as a gift. Here follows the tradition that has gone before except that 'Urwa (one of the narrators in the chain of transmitters) asked Abu Humaid: Did you hear it from the Messenger of Allah (himself) (may peace be upon him)? He replied: My ears heard it from his mouth.
[4514]
It has been reported on the authority of 'Adi b. 'Amira al-Kindi who said: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: Whoso from you is appointed by us to a position of authority and he conceals from us a needle or something smaller than that, it would be misappropriation (of public funds) and will (have to) produce it on the Day of Judgment. The narrator says: A dark-complexioned man from the Ansar stood up-I can visualise him still-and said: Messenger of Allah, take back from me your assignment. He said: What has happened to you? The man said: I have heard you say so and so. He said: I say that (even) now: Whoso from you is appointed by as to a position of authority, he should bring everything, big of small, and whatever he is given therefrom he should take, and he should restrain himself from taking that which is forbidden.
[4515]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Isma'il with the same chain of transmitters.
[4516]
Adi b. 'Amira al-Kindi heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying (as) was narrated in the (above-mentioned) hadith.
[4517]
It has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Juraij that the Qur'anic injunction: "0 you who believe, obey Allah, His Apostle and those in authority from amongst You" (iv. 59)-was revealed in respect of 'Abdullah b. Hudhafa b. Qais b. Adi al-Sahmi who was despatched by the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) as leader of a military campaign. The narrator said: He was informed of this fact by Ya'la b. Muslim who was informed by Sa'id b. Jubair who in turn was informed by Ibn Abbas.
[4518]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira that the Holy prophet (may peace be upon him) said: Whoso obeys me obeys God, and whoso disobeys me disobeys God. Whoso obeys the commander (appointed by me) obeys me, and whoso disobeys the commander disobeys me. The same tradition transmitted by different persons omits the portion: And whose disobeys the commander disobeys me.
[4519]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Whoso obeys me obeys God; and whose disobeys me disobeys God. Whoso obeys my commander obeys me, and whoso disobeys my commander disobeys me.
[4520]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters.
[4521]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira by more than one chain of transmitters.
[4522]
Hammam b. Munabbih has transmitted this hadith on the authority of Abu Huraira.
[4523]
According to one version of the tradition, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Whoso obeys the commander. He did not say: "My commander."
[4524]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: It is obligatory for you to listen to the ruler and obey him in adversity and prosperity, in pleasure and displeasure, and even when another person is given (rather undue) preference over you.
[4525]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Dharr who said: My friend (i.e. the Holy Prophet) advised me to listen (to the man in position of authority) and obey (him) even if he were a slave maimed (and disabled).
[4526]
In another version of the tradition, we have the wording: "An Abyssinian slave maimed and disabled."
[4527]
Abu 'Imran narrated this hadith with a slight change of wording.
[4528]
It has been narrated on the authority of Yahya b. Husain who learnt the tradition from his grandmother. She said that she heard the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) delivering his sermon on the occasion of the Last Pilgrimage. He was saying: If a slave is appointed over you and he conducts your affairs according to the Book of Allah, you should listen to him and obeey (his orders).
[4529]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters, and he said :"a negro slave".
[4530]
In other versions of the above tradition, the wordings are "an Abyssinian slave." and "a maimed Abyssinian slave".
[4531]
Another version of the tradition does not qualify the slave with the epithets "maimed," "an Abyssinian" but makes the addition: "I have heard the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) (say this) at Mina or 'Arafat."
[4532]
It has been narrated on the authority of Yahya b. Husain who learnt the tradition from his grandmother. Umm Husain. He said': I heard her say: I performed Hajjat-ul-Wada' in the company of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). He said a lot of things (on this occasion). Then I heard him say: If a maimed slave is appointed a commander over you the narrator says: I think she said: "a black stave" who leads you according to the Book of Allah, then listen to him and obey him.
[4533]
It has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Umar that the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) said: It is obligatory upon a Muslim that he should listen (to the ruler appointed over him) and obey him whether he likes it or not, except that he is ordered to do a sinful thing. If he is ordered to do a sinful act, a Muslim should neither. listen to him nor should he obey his orders.
[4534]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of 'Ubaidullah.
[4535]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu 'Abd al-Rahman from 'Ali that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sent a force (on a mission) and appointed over them a man. He kindled a fire and said: Enter it. Some people made up their minds to enter it (the fire), (carrying out the order of their commander), but the others said : We fled from the fire (that's why we have come into the fold of Islam). The matter was reported to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). He said to those who Contemplated entering (the fire at the order of their commander) : If you had entered it, you would have remained there until the Day of Judgment. He commanded the act of the latter group and said: There is no submission in matters involving God's disobedience or displeasure. Submission is obligatory only in what is good (and reasonable).
[4536]
It has been narrated on the authority of 'All who said: The Mersenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sent an expeditionand appointed over the Mujahids a man from the Ansar. (While making the appointment), he ordered that his work should be listened to and obeyed. They made him angry in a matter. He said: Collect for me dry wood. They collected it for him. Then he said: Kindle a fire. They kindled (the fire). Then he said: Didn't the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) order you to listen to me and obey (my orders)? They said: Yes. He said: Enter the fire. The narrator says: (At this), they began to look at one another and said: We fled from the fire to (find refuge with) the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) (and now you order us to enter it). They stood quiet until his anger cooled down and the fire went out. When they returned, they related the incident to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). He said: If they had entered it, they would not have come out. Obedience (to the commander) is obligatory only in what is good.
[4537]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of A'mash.
[4538]
It has been narrated on the authority of "Ubida who learnt the tradition from his father who, in turn, learnt it from his own father. 'Ubada's grandfather said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) took an oath of allegiance from us on our listening to and obeying the orders of our commander in adversity and prosperity, in pleasure and displeasure (and even) when somebody is given preference over us, on our avoiding to dispute the delegation of powers to a person deemed to be a fit recipient thereof (in the eye of one who delegates it) and on our telling the truth in whatever position we be without fearing in the matter ef Allah the reproach of the reproacher.
[4539]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Ubada b. Walid with the same chain of transmitters.
[4540]
The same tradition has been handed down through more than one chain of transmitters.
[4541]
It has been narrated on the authority of Junida b. Abu Umayya who said: We called upon 'Ubada b. Samit who was ill and said to him: May God give you health I Narrate to us a tradition which God may prove beneficial (to us) and which you have heard from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). He said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) called us and we took the oath of allegiance to him. Among the injunctions he made binding upon us was: Listening and obedience (to the Amir) in our pleasure and displeasure, in our adversity and prosperity, even when somebody is given preference over us, and without disputing the delegation of powers to a man duly invested with them (Obedience shall be accorded to him in all circumstances) except when you have clear signs of his disbelief in (or disobedience to) God-signs that could be used as a conscientious justification (for non-compliance with his orders).
[4542]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira that the Prophet of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: A commander (of the Muslims) is a shield for them. They fight behind him and they are protected by (him from tyrants and aggressors). If he enjoins fear of God, the Exalted and Glorious, and dispenses justice, there will be a (great) reward for him; and if he enjoins otherwise, it redounds on him.
[4543]
It has been narrated by Abu Huraira that the Holy Prophet (may pceace be upon him) said: Banu Isra'il were ruled over by the Prophets. When one Prophet died, another succeeded him; but after me there is no prophet and there will be caliphs and they will be quite large in number. His Companions said: What do you order us to do (in case we come to have more than one Caliph) ? He said: The one to whom allegiance is sworn first has a supremacy over the others. Concede to them their due rights (i.e. obey them). God (Himself) will question them about the subjects whom He had entrusted to them.
[4544]
The same tradition has been transmitted by a different chain of narrators.
[4545]
It has been narrated on the authority of 'Abdullah who said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: After me there will be favouritism anad many things that you will not like. They (his Companions) said: Messenger of Allah, what do you order that one should do it anyone from us has to live through such a time? He said: You should discharge your own responsibility (by obeying your Amir), and ask God to cuncede your right (by guiding the Amir to the right path or by replacing him by one more just and God-fearing).
[4546]
It has been narrated on the authority of 'Abd al-Rahman b. Abd Rabb al-Ka'ba who said: I entered the mosque when 'Abdullah b. 'Amr b. al-'As was sitting in the shade of the Ka'ba and the people had gathered around him. I betook myself to them and sat near him. (Now) Abdullah said: I accompanied the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on a journey. We halted at a place. Some of us began to set right their tents, others began to compete with one another in shooting, and others began to graze their beasts, when an announcer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) announced that the people should gather together for prayer, so we gathered around the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). He said: It was the duty of every Prophet that has gone before me to guide his followers to what he knew was good for them and warn them against what he knew was bad for them; but this Umma of yours has its days of peace and (security) in the beginning of its career, and in the last phase of its existence it will be afflicted with trials and with things disagreeable to you. (In this phase of the Umma), there will be tremendous trials one after the other, each making the previous one dwindle into insignificance. When they would be afflicted with a trial, the believer would say: This is going to bring about my destruction. When at (the trial) is over, they would be afflicted with another trial, and the believer would say: This surely is going to be my end. Whoever wishes to be delivered from the fire and enter the garden should die with faith in Allah and the Last Day and should treat the people as he wishes to be treated by them. He who swears allegiance to a Caliph should give him the piedge of his hand and the sincerity of his heart (i.e. submit to him both outwardly as well as inwardly). He should obey him to the best of his capacity. It another man comes forward (as a claimant to Caliphate), disputing his authority, they (the Muslims) should behead the latter. The narrator says: I came close to him ('Abdullah b. 'Amr b. al-'As) and said to him: Can you say on oath that you heard it from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him)? He pointed with his hands to his ears and his heart and said: My ears heard it and my mind retained it. I said to him: This cousin of yours, Mu'awiya, orders us to unjustly consume our wealth among ourselves and to kill one another, while Allah says: "O ye who believe, do not consume your wealth among yourselves unjustly, unless it be trade based on mutual agreement, and do not kill yourselves. Verily, God is Merciful to you" (iv. 29). The narrator says that (hearing this) Abdullah b. 'Amr b. al-As kept quiet for a while and then said: Obey him in so far as he is obedient to God; and diqobey him in matters involving disobedience to God.
[4547]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of A'mash with a different chain of transmitters.
[4548]
It has been narrated on the authority of 'Abd Rabb al-Ka'ba as-Sa'idl who said: I saw a group of people near the Ka'ba.... Then he narrated the tradition as narrated by A'mash.
[4549]
It has been narrated on the authority of Usaid b. Hudair that a man from the Ansar took the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) aside and said to him: Will you not appoint me governor as you have appointed so and so? He (the Messenger of Allah) said: You will surely come across preferential treatment after me, so you should be patient until you meet me at the Cistern (Haud-i-Kauthar).
[4550]
This tradition has been narrated on the same authority through a different chain of transmitters. Another version of the tradition narrated on the authority of Shu'ba does not include the words: "He took the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) aside."
[4551]
It has been narrated on the authority of Alqama b. Wai'l al-Hadrami who learnt the tradition from his father. The latter said: Salama b. Yazid al-ju'afi asked the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) : Prophet of Allah, what do you think if we have rulers who rule over us and demand that we discharge our obligations towards them, but they (themselves) do not discharge their own responsibilities towards us? What do you order us to do? The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) avoided giving any answer. Salama asked him again. He (again) avoided giving any answer. Then he asked again-it was the second time or the third time-when Ash'ath b. Qais (finding that the Holy Prophet was unnecessarily being pressed for answer) pulled him aside and said : Listen to them and obey them, for on them shall he their burden and on you shall be your burden.
[4552]
It has been narrated through a different chain of transmitters. on the authority of Simak who said: Ash'ath b. Qais pulled him (Salama b. Yazid) when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Listen to them and obey them, for on them shall be the burden of what tney do and on you shall be the burden of what you do.
[4553]
It has been narrated on the authority of Hudhaifa b. al-Yaman who said: People used to ask the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about the good times, but I used to ask him about bad times fearing lest they overtake me. I said: Messenger of Allah, we were in the midst of ignorance and evil, and then God brought us this good (time through Islam). Is there any bad time after this good one? He said: Yes. I asked : Will there be a good time again after that bad time ? He said: Yes, but therein will be a hidden evil. I asked: What will be the evil hidden therein? He said: (That time will witness the rise of) the people who will adopt ways other than mine and seek guidance other than mine. You will know good points as well as bad points. I asked: Will there be a bad time after this good one ? He said: Yes. (A time will come) when there will be people standing and inviting at the gates of Hell. Whoso responds to their call they will throw them into the fire. I said: Messenger of Allah, describe them for us. He said: All right. They will be a people having the same complexion as ours and speaking our language. I said: Messenger of Allah, what do you suggest if I happen to live in that time ? He said: You should stick to the main body of the Muslims and their leader. I said: If they have no (such thing as the) main body and have no leader ? He said : Separate yourself from all these factions, though you may have to eat the roots of trees (in a jungle) until death comes to you and you are in this state.
[4554]
It his been narrated through a different chain of transmitters, on the authority of Hudhaifa b. al-Yaman who said: Messenger of Allah, no doubt, we had an evil time (i.e. the days of Jahiliyya or ignorance) and God brought us a good time (i.e. Islamic period) through which we are now living Will there be a bad time after this good time ? He (the Holy Prophet) said: Yes. I said : Will there be a good time after this bad time? He said: Yes. I said: Will there be a bad time after good time? He said: Yes. I said: How ? Whereupon he said : There will be leaders who will not be led by my guidance and who will not adopt my ways ? There will be among them men who will have the hearts of devils in the bodies of human beings. I said: What should I do. Messenger of Allah, if I (happen) to live in that time ? He replied : You will listen to the Amir and carry out his orders; even if your back is flogged and your wealth is snatched, you should listen and obey.
[4555]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: One who defected from obedience (to the Amir) and separated from the main body of the Muslims-if he died in that state-would die the death of one belonging to the days of Jahiliyya (i.e. would not die as a Muslim). One who fights under the banner of a people who ate blind (to the cause for which they are fighting. i.e. do not know whether their cause is just or otherwise), who gets flared up with family pride, calls, (people) to fight for their. family honour, and supports his kith and kin (i.e. fignts not for the cause of Allah but for the sake of this family or tribe) -if he is killed (in this fight), he dies as one belonging to the days of Jhiliyya. Whoso attacks my Umma (indiscriminately) killing the righteous and the wicked of them, sparing not (even) those staunch in faith and fulfilling not his promise made with those who have been given a pledge of security-he has nothing to do with me and I have nothing to do with him.
[4556]
The same tradition has been narrated by the same authority through another chain of transmitters with a slight difference in wording.
[4557]
It has been narrated (through a different chain of transmitters) on the authority of Abu Huraira that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Who defected from obedience (to the Amir) and separated from the main body of the Muslim-then he died in that state-would die the death of one belonging to the days of Jahillyya. And he who is killed under the banner of a man who is blind (to the cause for which he is fighting), who gets flared up with family pride and fights for his tribe-is not from my Umma, and whoso from my followers attacks my followers (indiscriminately) killing the righteous and the wicked of them, sparing not (even) those staunch in faith and fulfilling not his obligation towards them who have been given a pledge (of security), is not from me (i.e. is not my follower).
[4558]
This hadlth has been narrated on the authority of Jarir with the same chain of transmitters with a slight variation in wording.
[4559]
It has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Abbas that the messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: One who found in his Amir something which he disliked should hold his patience, for one who separated from the main body of the Muslims even to the extent of a handspan and then he died would die the death of one belonging to the days of Jahiliyya.
[4560]
It has been narrated (through a different chain of transmitters) on the authority of Ibn Abbas that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upoh him) said: One who dislikes a thing done by his Amir should be patient over it, for anyone from the people who withdraws (his obedience) from the government, even to the extent of a handspan and died in that conditions, would die the death of one belonging to the days of jahilliyya.
[4561]
It has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Abdullah al-Bajali that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: One who is killed under the banner of a man who is blind (to his just cause), who raises the slogan of family or supports his own tribe, dies the death of one belonging to the days of Jahiliyya.
[4562]
It has been reported on the authority of Nafi, that 'Abdullah b. Umar paid a visit to Abdullah b. Muti' in the days (when atrocities were perpetrated on the People Of Medina) at Harra in the time of Yazid b. Mu'awiya. Ibn Muti' said: Place a pillow for Abu 'Abd al-Rahman (family name of 'Abdullah b. 'Umar). But the latter said: I have not come to sit with you. I have come to you to tell you a tradition I heard from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). I heard him say: One who withdraws his band from obedience (to the Amir) will find no argument (in his defence) when he stands before Allah on the Day of Judgment, and one who dies without having bound himself by an oath of allegiance (to an Amir) will die the death of one belonging to the days of Jahillyya.
[4563]
It has been narrated on t4e authority of Abu 'Umar that he visited Ibn Muti', and related from the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) the tradition that has gone before.
[4564]
The same tradition has been transmitted by a different chain of narrators.
[4565]
It has been narrated on the authority of 'Arfaja who said: I have heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: Different evils will make their appearance in the near future. Anyone who tries to disrupt the affairs of this Umma while they are united you should strike him with the sword whoever he be. (If remonstrance does not prevail with him and he does not desist from his disruptive activities, he is to be killed.)
[4566]
In another version of the tradition narrated on the same authority through a different chains of transmitters we have the words: "Kill him."
[4567]
It has been narrated (through a still different chain of transmitters) on the Same authority (i.e.'Arfaja) who said similarly-but adding: "Kill all of them." I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: When you are holding to one single man as your leader, you should kill who seeks to undermine your solidarity or disrupt your unity.
[4568]
It has been narrated on the authority of Aba Sa'id al-Khudri that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When oath of allegiance has been taken for two caliphs, kill the one for whom the oath was taken later.
[4569]
It has been narrated on the authority of Umm Salama that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: In the near future there will be Amirs and you will like their good deeds and dislike their bad deeds. One who sees through their bad deeds (and tries to prevent their repetition by his band or through his speech), is absolved from blame, but one who hates their bad deeds (in the heart of his heart, being unable to prevent their recurrence by his hand or his tongue), is (also) fafe ( so far as God's wrath is concerned). But one who approves of their bad deeds and imitates them is spiritually ruined. People asked (the Holy Prophet): Shouldn't we fight against them? He replied: No, as long as they say their prayers.
[4570]
It has been narrated (through a different chain of tmnamitters) on the authority of Umm Salama (wife of the Holy Prophet) that he said: Amirs will be appointed over you, and you will find them doing good as well as bad deeds. One who hates their bad deeds is absolved from blame. One who disapproves of their bad deeds is (also) safe (so far as Divine wrath is concerned). But one who approves of their bad deeds and imitates them (is doomed). People asked: Messenger of Allah, shouldn't we fight against them? He replied: No, as long as they say their prayer. ("Hating and disapproving" refers to liking and disliking from the heart.)
[4571]
Another version of the tradition narrated on the same authority attributes the same words to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) except that it replaces kariha with ankhara and vice versa.
[4572]
Another version omits a portion at the end of the tradition-a portion which begins with man radiya wa taba and ends with the last word of the tradition.
[4573]
It has been narrated on the authority of 'Auf b. Malik that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The best of your rulers are those whom you love and who love you, who invoke God's blessings upon you and you invoke His blessings upon them. And the worst of your rulers are those whom you hate and who hate you and whom you curse and who curse you. It was asked (by those present): Shouldn't we overthrow them with the help of the sword? He said: No, as long as they establish prayer among you. If you then find anything detestable in them. You should hate their administration, but do not withdraw yourselves from their obedience.
[4574]
It has been narrated on the authority of Auf b. Malik al-Ashja'i who said that he heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: The best of your rulers are those whom you love and who love you, upon whom you invoke God's blessings and who invoke His blessing upon you. And the worst of your rulers are those whom you hate and who hate you, who curse you and whom you curse. (Those present) said: Shouldn't we overthrow them at this? He said: No, as long as they establish prayer among you. No, as long as they establish prayer among you. Mind you! One who has a governor appointed over him and he finds that the governor indulges in an act of disobedience to God, he should condemn the governor's act, in disobedience to God, but should not withdraw himself from his obedience. Ibn Jabir said: Ruzaiq narrated to me this hadith. I asked him: Abu Miqdam, have you heard it from Muslim b. Qaraza or did he describe it to you and he heard it from 'Auf (b. Malik) and he transmitted this tradition of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)? Upon this Ruzaiq sat upon his knees and facing the Qibla said: By Allah, besides Whom there is no other God, I heard it from Muslim b. Qaraza and he said that te had heard it from Auf(b. Malik) and he said that he had heard it from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[4575]
The above tradition has been narrated through a different chain of transmitters.
[4576]
It has been narrated on the authority of Jabir who said: We were one thousand and four hundred on the Day of Hudaibiya. We swore fealty to hiin (the Holy Prophet) and 'Umar was holding the latter's hand (when he was sitting) under the tree (called) Samura (to administer the oath to the Companions). The narrator added: We took oath to the effect that we would not flee (from the battlefield if there was an encounter with the Meccans), but we did not take oath to fight to death.
[4577]
It has been narrated (through a different chain of transmitters) on the authority of Jabir who said: While swearing fealty to the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) we did not take the oath to death but that we would not run away (from the battlefield).
[4578]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Zubair who heard Jabir being questioned as to how many people were there on the Day of Hudaibiya He replied: We wore fourteen hundred. We swore fealty to him, and Umar was holding his hand while he was sitting Under the tree (to administer the oath). The tree was Samura (a wild tree found in desers). All of as took tha oath of fealty at his hands except Jadd b. Qais al-Ansari who hid himself under the belly of his camel.
[4579]
It has been narrated (through a different chain of transmitters) on the authority of Abu Zubair who heard Jabir being questioned as to whether the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) took the oath of fealty at Dhu'l-Hulaifa. He said : No! But he offered his prayers at that place, and he administered the oath of fealty nowhere except near the tree in (the plain oo Hudaibiya. Ibn Juraij said that he was informed by Abu Zabair who heard Jabir b. Abdullah say: The Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) prayed over the well at Hudaibiya (as a result of which its scanty water rose up and increased so as to be sufficient for the 1400 or 1500 men who had encamped at the place).
[4580]
It has been narrated (through a different chain of transmitters) on the authority of Jabir who said: We were one thousand and four hundred on the Day of Hudaibiya when the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) said to us: Today you are the best people on the earth. And Jabir said: If I had the eyesight, I could show you the place of the tree.
[4581]
It has been narrated on the authority of Salim b. Abu al-Ja'd who said: I asked Jabir b. 'Abdullah about the number of the Companions (of the Holy Prophet who took the oath of fealty under) the tree. He said: If we were a hundred thousand, it (i.e. the water in the well at Hudaibiya) would have sufficed us, but actually we were one thousand and five hundred.
[4582]
It has been narrated on the authority of Jabir who said: If we had been a hundred thousand in number, it (the water) would have sufficed us, but actually we were fifteen hundred.
[4583]
It has been narrated (through a different chain of transmitters) on the authority of Salim b. al-Ja'd who said: I asked Jabir: How many were you on the Day of Hudaibiya? He said: One thousand and four hundred.
[4584]
It has been narrated on the authority of 'Abdullah b. Abu Aufa who said: The Companions of the Tree (i e. those who swore fealty under the tree) were one thousand and three hundred, and the people of Aslam tribe were one-eighth of the Muhajirs.
[4585]
The same tradition has been handed down through a different chain of transmitters.
[4586]
It has been narrated on the authority of Ma'qil b. Yasar who aaid: I remember being present on the Day of the Tree, and the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) was taking the oath of the people and I was holding a twig of the tree over his head. We were fourteen hundred (in number). We did not take oath to the death, but to the effect that we would not run away from the battlefield.
[4587]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Yunus with the same chain of transmitters.
[4588]
It has been narrated on the authority of Sa'id b. Musayyab who said: My father was one of those who swore fealty to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) near the tree. When we passed that way next year intending to perform the Hajj, the place of the tree was hidden to us. If you could point out clearly, you would (certainly) be knowing better.
It has also been narrated on the authority of Sa'id b. Musayyib who learnt from his father that they were with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in the year of the Tree (i.e. in the year of the fealty of God's pleasure sworn under the tree at Hudaibiya), but next year they forgot the spot of the tree.
[4589]
The tradition has been narrated on the authority of Sa'id b. Musayyib who learnt it from his father. The latter said: I had seen the tree. When I came to the spot afterwards, I could not recognise it.
[4590]
It has been narrated on the authority of Yazid b. Abu Ubaid (the freed slave of Salama b. al-Akwa') who said: I asked Salama as to what effect he had sworn fealty to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on the Day of Hudaibiya. He said: To the effect that we will die fighting.
[4591]
The above tradition has also been handed down through a different chain of transmitters.
[4592]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abdullah b. Zaid who said: A person came to him and said: Here is Ibn Hanzala who is making people swear allegiance to him. He (,Abdullah) asked: To what effect? He replied: To the effect that they will die for him. 'Abdullah said: I will never swear allegiance to this effect after the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[4593]
It has been narrated by Salama b. al-Akwa' that he visited al-Hajjaj who said to him: O son of al-Akwa', you have turned apostate and have come to live again in the desert with the Bedouins (after your migration). He said: No, but the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) has permitted me to live in the desert.
[4594]
It has been reported on the authority of Mujashi' b. Mas'ud as-Sulami who said: I came to the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) to offer him my pledge of migration. He said: The period of migration has expired (and those who wereto get the reward for this great act of devotion have got it). You may now give your pledge to serve the cause of Islam, to strive in the way of Allah and to follow the path of virtue.
[4595]
It has been reported on the authority of Mujashi' b. Mas'ud who said: I brought my brother Abu Ma'bad to the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) after the conquest of Mecca and said: Messenger of Allah, allow him to swear his pledge of migration at your hand. He said: The period of migration is over with those who had to do it (and now nobody can get this meritorious distinctions) I said: For what actions will you allow him to bind himself in oath? He said: (He can do so) for serving the cause of Islam, for fighting in the way of Allah and for fighting in the cause of virtue. Abd Uthman said: I met Abd Ma'bad and told him what I had heard from Mujashi'. He said: He has told the truth.
[4596]
Another version of the tradition transmitted on the authority of Asim has the same wording but does not mention the name of Abu Ma'bad.
[4597]
It has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Abbas that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said on the day of the Conquest of Mecca: There is no Hijra now, but (only) Jihad (fighting for the cause of Islam) and sincerity of purpose (have great reward); when you are asked to set out (on an expedition undertaken for the cause of Islam) you should (readily) do so.
[4598]
The above tradition has been handed down through a different chain of transmitters.
[4599]
'A'isha reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was asked about migration, whereupon he said: There is no migration after the Conquest (of Mecca), but Jihad and sincere intention. When you are asked to set out (for the cause of Islam), you should set out,
[4600]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Sa'id al-Khudari that a Bedouin asked the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about Migration. He replied: Do you talk of Hijra? The affair of Hijra is very difficult. But have you got camels? The bedouin said: Yes. He asked: Do you pay the poor-rate payable on their account? He replied: Yes. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Go on doing good deeds (across the seas), for surely God will not leave any of your deeds unrewarded.
[4601]
This tradition has been handed down through a different chain of transmitter with the addition of the following words at the end: "Do you milk them on the day they arrive at the water? He replied: Yes."
[4602]
It has been narrated on the authority of 'A'isha, the wife of the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him). She said: When the believing women migrated (to Medina) and came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), they would be tested in accordance with the following words of Allah. the Almighty and Exalted: "O Prophet, when believing women come to thee to take the oath of fealty to thee that they will not associate in worship anything with God, that they will not steal. that, they will not commit adultery. . ." to the end of the verse (lx. 62).
Whoso from the believing women accepted these conditions and agreed to abide by them were considered to have offered themselves for swearing fealty. When they had (formally) declared their resolve to do so, the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) would say to them: You may go. I have confirmed your fealty. By God, the hand of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) never touched the hand of a woman. He would take the oath of fealty from them by oral declaration. By God, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) never took any vow from women except that which God had ordered him to take, and his palm never touched the palm of a woman. When he had taken their vow, he would tell them that he had taken the oath from them orally.
[4603]
It has been narrated on the authority of 'Urwa that 'A'isha described to him the way the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) took the oath of fealty from women. She said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) never touched a woman with his hand. He would only take a vow from her and when he had taken the (verbal) vow, he would say: You may go. I have accepted your fealty.
[4604]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abdullah b. 'Umar who said: We used to take oath to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) that we would listen to and obey his orders. He would tell us (to say in the oath): As far as it lies in my power.
[4605]
It has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Umar who said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) inspected me on the battlefield on the Day of Uhud, and I was fourteen years old. He did not allow me (to take part in the fight). He inspected me on the Day of Khandaq-and I was fifteen yearsold, and he permitted me (to fight), Nafi' said: I came to 'Umar b. 'Abd al-'Aziz who was then Caliph, and narrated this tradition to him. He said: Surely, this is the demarcation between a minor and a major. So he wrote to his governors that they should pay subsistence allowance to one who was fifteen years old, but should treat those of lesser age among children.
[4606]
This tradition has been handed down through a different chain Of transmitters with the following change in the wording: "I was fourteen years old and he thought me too young (to participate in the fight)."
[4607]
It has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Umar who said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade that one should travel to the land of the enemy taking the Qur'an with him.
[4608]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abdullah b. Umar that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to forbid that one should travel to the land of the enemy taking the Qur'an (with him) lest it should fall into the hands of the enemy.
[4609]
It has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Umar that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Do not take the Qur'an on a journey with you, for I am afraid lost it should fall into the hands of the enemy. Ayyub (one of the narrators in the chain of transmitters) said: The enemy may seize it and may quarrel with you over it.
[4610]
It has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Umar that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had a race of the horses which had been especially prepared for the purpose from Hafya' to Thaniyyat al-Wada' (the latter being the winning post), and of those which had not been trained from Thaniyya to the mosque of Banu Zuraiq, and Ibn Umar was among those who took part in this race.
[4611]
This tradition has been handed down through another chain of transmitters with the addition of the following words from Abdullah b. 'Umar :"I came first in the race and my horse jumped into the mosque with me."
[4612]
It has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Umar that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: There will be great benefit in the forelock of the horses until the Day of judgment.
[4613]
The same tradition has been handed down through a different chain of transmitters.
[4614]
It has been narrated on the authority of Jarir b. Abdullah who said: I saw that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was twisting the forelock of a horse with his fingers and he was saying: (A great) benefit. i.e. reward (for rearing them for Jihad) and spoils of war, has been tied to the forelocks of horses until the Day of Judgment.
[4615]
The above tradition has also been narrated on the authority of Yunus through a different chain of transmitters.
[4616]
The same tradition has been narrated on the authority of Urwat al-Bariqi who said that the Prophet (may peace be upon him) said: Great good is attached to the forelock of the horses until the Day of Judgment.
[4617]
'Urwat al-Bariqi reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said this: Good is tied to the forelock of the horses. It Was said to him: Messenger of Allah, why is it so? He (the Holy Prophet said): For reward and booty until the Day of Judgment.
[4618]
This hadith has been narrated with the same chain of transmitters with the difference that here instead of "Urwat al-Bariqi" there is "Urwa b. ja'd."
[4619]
A version of the tradition narrated on the authority of 'Urwat al-Bariqi does not mention (the words): "reward and booty".
[4620]
A version of the tradition transmitted on the authority of 'Urwa b. al-ja'd does not mention "reward and booty".
[4621]
It has been narrated on the authority of Anas b. Malik that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: There is a blessing in the forelocks of the war horses.
[4622]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Anas through another chain of transmitters.
[4623]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abn Huraira that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to dislike the Shikal horse.
[4624]
This tradition has been narrated on the authority of Sufyan with the addition from Abd ar-Razzaq (one of the narrators) explaining the meaning of shikal as a bone whose right back foot and left front foot or left back foot and right front foot are white.
[4625]
The tradition has been handed down through a different chain of transmitters.
[4626]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira that the Messenger of Allah (may peace upon him) said: Allah has undertaken to look after the affairs of one who goes out to fight in His way believing in Him and affirming the truth of His Apostles. He is committed to His care that Re will either admit him to Paradise or bring him back to his home from where he set out with a reward or (his share of) booty. By the Being in Whose Hand is the life of Muhammad. If a person gets wounded in the way of Allah, he will come on the Day of Judgment with his wound in the same condition as it was when it was first inflicted; its colour being the colour of blood but its smell will be the smell of musk. By, the Being in Whose Hand is Muhammad's life, if it were not to be too hard upon the Muslime. I would not lag behind any expedition which is going to fight in the cause of Allah. But I do not have abundant means to provide them (the Mujahids) with riding beasts, nor have they (i.e. all of them) abundant means (to provide themselves with all the means of Jihad) so that they could he left behind. By the Being in Whose Hand is Mubammgls lac, I love to fight in the way of Allah and be killed, to fight and again be killed and to fight again and be killed.
[4627]
The same tradition has been melted through another chain of transmitters.
[4628]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira who said: Allah has undertaken to provide for one who leaves his home (only) to fight for His cause and to affirm the truth of His word; Allah will either admit him to Paradise or will bring him back home from where he had come out, with his reward and booty.
[4629]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: One who is wounded in the way of Allah-and Allah knows better who is wounded in His way-will appear on the Day of Judgment with his wound bleediing. The colour (of its discharge) will be the colour of blood, (but) its smell will be the smell of musk.
[4630]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Haraira that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Every wound received by a Muslim in the way of Allah will appear on the Day of Judgment in the same condition as it was when it was inflicted, and would be bleeding profusely. The colour (of its discharge) will be the colour of blood, but its smell will be the smell of musk. By the Being in Whose Hand is Muhammad's life, if it were not hard upon the Muslims, I would not lag behind any expedition undertaken for Jihad, but I do not possess abundant means to provide the Mujahids with riding animals, nor do they (i.e. all of them) have abundant means (to provide themselves with all the means of Jihad) to follow me, nor would it please their hearts to stay behind me.
[4631]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira who said: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: I would not stay behind (when) an expedition (for Jihad was being mobilised) if it were going to be too hard upon the believers. . . . This is followed by the same words as have appeared in the previous tradition, but this tradition has the same ending as the previous hadith with a slight difference in the wording: "By the Being in Whose Hand is my life, I love that I should be killed in the way of Allah; then I should be brought back to life and be killed again in His way. . . . "
[4632]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: If it were not hard upon my Umma (to follow my example), I would not lag behind any expedition-as in the traditions gone before.
[4633]
Another version of the tradition narrated through a different chain of transmitters on the authority of Abu Huraira has the same wording as the previous tradition:"Allah takes care of one who goes out in the way of Allah" but ends in the words:"I would not lag behind any expedition which is undertaken to fight in the way of Allah, the Exalted."
[4634]
It has been narrated on the authority of Anas b. Malik that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said :"Nobody who dies and has something good for him with Allah will (ever like to) return to this world even though he were offered the whole world and all that is in its (as an inducement), except the martyr who desires to return and be killed in the world for the (great) merit of martyrdom that he has seen.
[4635]
It has been narrated on the authority of Anas b. Malik (through a different chain of transmitters) that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Nobody who enters Paradise will (ever like to) return to this world even if he were offered everything on the surface of the earth (as an inducement) except the martyr who will desire to return to this world and be killed ten times for the sake of the great honour that has been bestowed upon him.
[4636]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira who said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was asked: What deed could be an equivalent of Jihad in the way of Allah, the Almighty and Exalted? He answered: You do not have the strength to do that deed. The narrator said : They repeated the question twice or thrice. Every time he answered: You do not have the strength to do it. When the question was asked for the third time, he said: One who goes out for Jibad is like a person who keeps fasts, stands in prayer (constantly), (obeying) Allah's (behests contained in) the verses (of the Qur'an), and does not exhibit any lassitude in fasting and prayer until the Mujihid returns from Jihad in the way of Allah, the Exalted.
[4637]
This tradition has been handed down through a different chain of transmitters.
[4638]
It has been narrated on the authority of Nu'man b. Bashir who said: As I was (sitting) near the pulpit of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), a man said: I do not care if, after embracing Islam, I do not do any good deed (except) distributing drinking water among the pilgrims. Another said: I do not care if, after embracing Islam, I do not do any good deed beyond maintenance service to the Sacred Mosque. Another said: Jihad in the way of Allah is better than what you have said. 'Umar reprimanded them and said: Don't raise your voices near the pulpit of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on Friday. When prayer was over, I entered (the apartment of the Holy Prophet) and asked his verdict about the matter in which they had differed. (It was upon this that) Allah, the Almighty and Exalted, revealed the Qur'anic verse: "Do you make the giving of drinking water to the pilgrims and the maintenance of the Sacred Mosque equal to (the service of those) who believe in Allah and the Last Day and strive hard in the cause of Allah. They are not equal in the sight of God. And Allah guides not the wrongdoing people" (ix. 20). This tradition has been narrated on the authority of Nu'man b. Bashir through another chain of transmitters.
[4639]
It has been narrated on the authority of Anas b. Malik that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Leaving (for Jihad) in the way of Allah in the morning or in the evening (will merit a reward) better than the world and all that is in it.
[4640]
It has been narrated on the authority of Sahl b. Sa'd as-Sa'idi that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The journey undertaken by a person in the morning (for Jihad) in the way of Allah (will merit a reward) better than the world and all that is in it.
[4641]
It has been narrated on the authority of Sahl b. Sa'd as-Sa'idi that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: A journey undertaken in the morning or evening (fond Jihad) in the way of Allah (will merit a reward) better than the world and all that is in it.
[4642]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: If some persons of my Umma (were not to undertake the hardships of Jihad), and he (Abu Huraira) then narrated the rest of the hadith and then said: A journey undertaken for jihad in the evening or morning merits a reward better than the world and all that is in it.
[4643]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Ayyub that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: A journey undertaken in the morning or evening (for Jihad) in the way of Allah is better than (anything) on which the sun rises or sets.
[4644]
This tradition has been narrated on the authority of Abu Ayyub through a different chain of transmitters having the same wording.
[4645]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Sa'id Khudri that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said (to him): Abu Sa'id, whoever cheerfully accepts Allah as his Lord, Islam as his religion and Mubammad as his Apostle is necessarily entitled to enter Paradise. He (Abu Sa'id) wondered at it and said: Messenger of Allah, repeat it for me. He (the Messenger of Allah) did that and said: There is another act which elevates the position of a man in Paradise to a grade one hundred (higher), and the elevation between one grade and the other is equal to the height of the heaven from the earth. He (Abu Sa'id) said: What is that act ? He replied: Jihad in the way of Allah ! Jihad in the way of Allah !
[4646]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Qatada that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) stood up among them (his Companions) to deliver his sermon in which he told them that Jihad in the way of Allah and belief in Allah (with all His Attributes) are the most meritorious of acts. A man stood up and said: Messenger of Allah, do you think that if I am killed in the way of Allah, my sins will be blotted out from me? The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Yes, in case you are killed in the way of Allah and you were patient and sincere and you always fought facing the enemy, never turming your back upon him. Then he added: What have you said (now)? (Wishing to have further assurance from him for his satisfaction), he asked (again): Do you think if I am killed in the way of Allah, all my sins will be obliterated from me? The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Yes, it you were patient and sincere and always fought facing the enemy and never turning your back upon him, (all your lapses would be forgiven) except debt. Gabriel has told me this.
[4647]
The tradition has been narrated through a different chain of transmitters on the authority of Abu Qatada who said: A man came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) while he was on the pulpit and said: Do you think if I am killed in the way of Allah ... (except this difference in its beginning, the rest of the tradition is the same as the previous one).
[4648]
Another version of the tradition differently transmitted begins with the words: "A man came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he was sitting on the pulpit.... He said: What do you find if I strike with the sword?" (The rest of the tradition is the same as the previous one.)
[4649]
It has been reported on the authority of 'Amr b. al-'As that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: All the sins of a Shahid (martyr) are forgiven except debt.
[4650]
It has been reported on the authority of Amr b. al-'As through a different chain of transmitters that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Death in the way of Allah blots out everything except debt.
[4651]
It has been narrated on the authority of Masruq Who said: We asked 'Abdullah about the Qur'anic verse: "Think not of those who are slain in Allah's way as dead. Nay, they are alive, finding their sustenance in the presence of their Lord. ." (iii. 169). He said: We asked the meaning of the verse (from the Holy Prophet) who said: The souls, of the martyrs live in the bodies of green birds who have their nests in chandeliers hung from the throne of the Almighty. They eat the fruits of Paradise from wherever they like and then nestle in these chandeliers. Once their Lord cast a glance at them and said: Do ye want anything? They said: What more shall we desire? We eat the fruit of Paradise from wherever we like. Their Lord asked them the same question thrice. When they saw that they will continue to be asked and not left (without answering the question). they said: O Lord, we wish that Thou mayest return our souls to our bodies so that we may be slain in Thy way once again. When He (Allah) saw that they had no need, they were left (to their joy in heaven).
[4652]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Sa'id Khudri that a man came to the Holy Prophet (may peace he upon him) and said: Who is the best of men? He replied: A man who fights in the way of Allah spending his wealth and staking his life. The man then asked: Who is next to him (in excellence)? He said: Next to him is a believer who lives in a mountain gorge worshipping hid Lord and sparing men from his mischief.
[4653]
It has been narrated (through a diferent chain of transmetters) on the same authority (i.e. Abu Sa'id Khadri) who said: A man asked: Messenger of Allah, which of men is the best? He said : A believer who fights staking his life and spending his wealth in the way of Allah. He asked: Who is next to him (in excellence) ? He said: Next to him is a man who lives an isolated life in a mountain gorge, worshipping his Lord and sparing men from his mischief.
[4654]
A version of the tradition narrated on the authority of Ibn Shihab has a little differently worded ending. i.e. "A man in a mountain valley." but did not mention "next to him a man who...."
[4655]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Of the men he lives the best life who holds the reins of his horse (ever ready to march) in the way of Allah, flies on its back whenever he hears a fearful shriek, or a call for help, flies to it seeking death at places where it can be expected. (Next to him) is a man who lives with his sheep at a hill-top or in a valley, says his prayers regularly, gives Zakat and worships his Lord until death comes to him. There is no better person among men except these two.
[4656]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Huraira with a slight variation of wording.
[4657]
Two more versions of the tradition narrated by 'Abdullah b. Badr and Abu Huraira, respectively, have been handed down through different chains of transmitters with negligible difference in the wording.
[4658]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: God laughs at the two men both of whom will enter Paradise (though) one of them kills the other. They said: Messenger of Allah, how is it? He said: One of them fights in the way of Allah, the Almighty and Exalted. and dies a martyr. Then God turns in mercy to the murderer who embraces Islam, fights in the way of Allah, the Almighty and Exalted, and dies a martyr.
[4659]
The same tradition has been narrated on the authority of Abu Zinad (with the same chain of transmitters).
[4660]
It has been reported on the authority of Abu Huraira that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: God laughs at the two men one of whom kills the other; both of them will enter Paradise. They (the Companions) said: How, Messenger of Allah? He said: One is slain (in the way of Allah) and enters Paradise. Then God forgives the other and guides him to Islam; then he fights in the way of Allah and dies a martyr.
[4661]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira that the Messenger Allah (may peace be upon him) said: A disbeliever and a believer who killed him will never be gathered together in Hell.
[4662]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: No two such persons shall be together in Hell as if one of them is such that his presence hurts the other. It was asked: Messenger of Allah, who are they? He said: A believer who killed a disbeliever and (then) kept to the right path."
[4663]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Mas'ud al-Ansari who said A man brought a muzzled she-camel and said: It is (offered) in the way of Allah. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: For this you will have seven hundred she-camels on the Day of Judgment all of which will be muzzled.
[4664]
A similar tradition has been narrated on the authority of al-A'mash.
[4665]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Mas'ud al-Ansari who said: A man came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said: My riding beast has been killed, so give me some animal to ride upon. He (the Holy Prophet) said: I have none with me. A man said: Messenger of Allah, I can guide him to one who will provide him with a riding beast. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: One who guides to something good has a reward similar to that of its doer.
[4666]
The above tradition has been handed down through a different chain of transmitters.
[4667]
It has been narrated on the authority of Anas b. Malik that a young man from Aslam tribe said: Messenger of Allah, I wish to fight (in the way of Allah) but I don't have anything to equip myself with for fighting. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Go to so and so, for he had equipped himself (for fighting) but he fell ill. So, he (the young man) went to him and said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sends you his greetings and says that you should give me the equipage that you have provided yourself with. The man said (to his wife or maidservant): So and so, give him the equipage I have collected for myself and do not withhold anything from him. Do not withhold anything from him so that you may be blessed therein.
[4668]
It has been narrated on the authority of Zaid b. Kbalid al-Juhani that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Anybody who equips a warrior (going to fight) in the way of Allah (is like one who actually) fights. And anybody who looks well after his family in his absence (is also like one who actually) fights.
[4669]
The above tradition has been narrated on the authority of Khalid al- Juhani who said: The Prophet of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who equips a warrior in the way of Allah (is like one who dctually fights) aud he who looks after the family of a warrior in the way of Allah in fact participated in the battle.
[4670]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Sa'id Khudri that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sent a force to Banu Lihyan (who are from Banu Hudhail, and said: One man from every two and the reward (will be divided) between the two.
[4671]
The above tradition has also been narrated through two different chains of transmitters on the authority of Abu Sa'id Khudri and Yahya, respectively.
[4672]
It has been narrated (through a still different chain of transmitters) on the authority of Abu Sa'id Khudrl that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) despatched a force to Banu Lihyan. (and said:) One man from every two should join the force. Then he said to those who stayed behind: Those of you who will look well after the family and wealth of those who are going on the expedition will be getting half the reward of the warriors.
[4673]
It has been narrated on the authority of Sulaimin b. Buraida who learnt the tradition from his father. The latter said that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: The sanctity of the wives of Mujahids is like the sanctity of their mothers for those who sit at home (i.e do not go out for Jihad). Anyone who stays behind looking after the family of a Mujahid and betrays his trust will be made to stand on the Day of judgment before the Mujahid who will take away from his meritorious deeds whatever he likes. So what do you think (will he leave anything)?
[4674]
This tradition has been narrated by the same authority through different chain of transmitters.
[4675]
A version of the tradition narrated on the authority of 'Alqama b. Murthad has a differently worded end: It will be said to the Mujahid: Take from his noble deeds whatever you like. Then the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) turned to us and asked: What do you think (will he leave anything)?-(i.e. he will take away everything).
[4676]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Ishaq, that he heard Bara' talking about the Qur'anic verse: "Those who sit (at home) from among the believers and those who go out for Jihad in the way of Allah are not aqual" (iv. 95). (He said that) the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) ordered Zaid (to write the verse). He brought a shoulder-blade (of a slaughtered camel) and inscribed it (the verse) thereon. The son of Umm Maktum complained of his blindness to the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him). (At this) descended the revelation: "Those of the believers who sit (at home) without any trouble (illness, incapacity, disability)" (iv. 95). The tradition has been handed down through two other chains of transmitters.
[4677]
It has been narrated on the authority of Bara' who said: When the Qur'anic verse: "Those who sit (at home) from among mu'min" (iv. 94) was revealed, the son of Umm Maktum spoke to him (the Holy Prophet). (At this). the words: "other than those who have a trouble (illness)" were revealed.
[4678]
It has been reported on the authority of Jabir that a man said: Messenger of Allah, where shall I be if I am killed? He replied: In Paradise. The man threw away the dates he had in his hand and fought until he was killed (i.e. he did not wait until he could finish the dates).
In the version of the tradition narrated by Suwaid we have the words: "A man said to the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him). on the day of Uhud......"
[4679]
It has been reported on the authority of Bara!' who stated: A man from Banu Nabit (one of the Ansar tribes) came to the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) and said: I testify that there is no god except Allah and that thou art His bondman and Messenger. Then he went forward and fought until he was killed. The Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) said: He has done a little but shall be given a great reward.
[4680]
It has been reported on the authority of Anas b. Malik who said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) sent Busaisah as a scout to see what the caravan of Abu Sufyan was doing. He came (back and met the Holy Prophet in his house) where there was nobody except myself and the Messenger of Allah. I do not remember whether he (Hadrat Anas) made an exception of some wives of the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him)or not and told him the news of the caravan. (Having heard the news), the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) came out (hurriedly), spoke to the people and said: We are in need (of men); whoever has an animal to ride upon ready with him should ride with us. People began to ask him permission for bringing their riding animals which were grazing on the hillocks near Medina. He said : No. (I want) only those who have their riding animals ready. So the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and his Companions proceeded towards Badr and reached there forestalling the polytheists (of Mecca). When the polytheists (also) reached there, the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: None of you should step forward to (do) anything unless I am ahead of him. The polytheists (now) advanced (towards us), and the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said . Get up to enter Paradise which is equal in width to the heavens and the earth. 'Umair b. al- Humam al-Ansari said: Messenger of Allah, is Paradise equal in extent to the heavens and the earth? He said: Yes. 'Umair said: My goodness ! The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) asked him: What prompted you to utter these words (i.e. my goodness !') ? He said: Messenger of Allah, nothing but the desire that I be among its residents. He said: Thou art (surely) amona its residents. He took out dates from his bag and began to eat them. Then he said: If I were to live until I have eaten all these dates of mine, it would be a long life. (The narrator said): He threw away all the dates he had with him. Then he fought the enemies until he was killed.
[4681]
The tradition has been narrated on the authority of 'Abdullah b. Qais. He heard it from his father who, while facing the enemy, reported that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Surely, the gates of Paradise are under the shadows of the swords. A man in a shabby condition got up and said; Abu Musa, did you hear the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say this? He said: Yes. (The narrator said): He returned to his friends and said: I greet you (a farewell greeting). Then he broke the sheath of his sword, threw it away, advanced with his (naked) sword towards the enemy and fought (them) with it until he was slain.
[4682]
It has been reported on the authority of Anas b. Malik that some people came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said to him: Send with us some men who may teach us the Qur'an and the Sunnah. Accordingjy, he sent seventy men from the Ansar. They were called the Reciters and among them was my maternal uncle. Haram. They used to recite the Qur'an, discuss and ponder over its meaning at night. In the day they brought water and poured it (in pitchers) in the mosque, collected wood and sold it, and with the sale proceeds bought food for the people of the Suffa and the needy. The Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) sent the Reciters with these people, but these (treacherous people) fell upon them and killed thern before they reached their destination (While dying), they said: O Allah, convey from us the news to our Prophet that we have met Thee (in a way) that we are pleased with Thee and Thou art pleased with us. (The narrator said): A man attacked Haram (maternal uncle of Anas)) from behind and smote him with a spear which pierced him. (While dying), Haram said: By the Lord of the Ka'ba, I have met with success. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said to his Companions: Your brethren have been slain grid they were saying: O Allah, convey from us to our Prophet the news that we have met Thee in a way that we are pleased with Thee and Thou art pleased with us.
[4683]
It has been Deported on the authority of Anas who said: My uncle and I have been named after him was not present with the Messenger of Allah (mav peace be upon him) on the Day of Badr. He felt distressed about it. He would say: I have missed the first battle fought by the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and if God now gives me an opportunity to see a battlefield with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), God will see what I do therein. He was afraid to say more than this (lest he be unable to keep his word with God). He was present with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on the Day of Uhud. He met Sa'd b. Mu'adh (who was retreating). Anas said to him: O Abu 'Amr, where (are you going)?Woe (to thee) ! I find the smell of Paradise beside the Uhud mountain. (Reprimanding Sa'd in these words) he went forward and fought thein (the enemy) until he was killed. (The narrator says). More than eighty wounds inflicted with swords, spears and arrows were found on his body. His sister, my aunt, ar-Rubayyi', daughter of Nadr, said: I could not recognise my brother's body (it was so badly mutilated) except from his finger-tips. (It was on this occasion that) the Qur'anic verse: "Among the Believers are men who have been true to their covenant with God. Of them some have completed their vow (to the extreme), and some still wait: but they have never changed (their determination) in the least" (xxxiii. 23).
The narrator said that the verse had been revealed about him (Anas b. Nadr) and his Companions.
[4684]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Musa Ash'ari that a desert Arab came to the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) and said: Messenger of Allah, one man fights fgr the spoils of war; another fights that he may be remembered, and another fights that he may see his (high) position (achieved as a result of his valour in fighting). Which of these is fighting in the cause of God? The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Who fights so that the word of Allah is exalted is fighting in the way of Allah.
[4685]
It has been narrated (through another chain of transmitters) on the authority of Abu Musa who said. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) was asked which of the men fights in the way of Allah: (one who fights) for displaying his valour; (a man who) fights out of his family pride and (a man who) fights for the sake of show, who amongst these fights in the way of Allah? The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Who fights that the word of Allah be exalted fights in the way of Allah.
[4686]
It has been narrated (through yet another chain of transmitters) on the same authority, i.e. Abu Musa, who said: We, came to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and said: Messenger of Allah, one of us hho fights to display his valour. . . (followed by the same words as we have in the previous tradition).
[4687]
It has been narrated through a different chain of transmitters on the same authority, i.e. Abu Musa Ash'ari, that a man asked the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about fighting in the way of Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, a man who fights out of rage or out of family pride. He raised his head towards him-and he did so because the man was standing and said: Who fights that the word of Allah be exalted fights in the way of Allah.
[4688]
It has been narrated on the authority of Sulaiman b. Yasar who said: People dispersed from around Abu Huraira, and Natil, who was from the Syrians. said to him: O Shaikh, relate (to us) a tradition you have heard from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). He said: Yes. I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: The first of men (whose case) will be decided on the Day of Judgment will be a man who died as a martyr. He shall be brought (before the Judgment Seat). Allah will make him recount His blessings (i.e. the blessings which He had bestowed upon him) and he will recount them (and admit having enjoyed them in his life). (Then) will Allah say: What did you do (to requite these blessings)? He will say: I fought for Thee until I died as a martyr. Allah will say: You have told a lie. You fought that you might be called a "brave warrior". And you were called so. (Then) orders will be passed against him and he will be dragged with his face downward and cast into Hell. Then will be brought forward a man who acquired knowledge and imparted it (to others) and recited the Qur'an. He will be brought And Allah will make him recount His blessings and he will recount them (and admit having enjoyed them in his lifetime). Then will Allah ask: What did you do (to requite these blessings)? He will say: I acquired knowledge and disseminated it and recited the Qur'an seeking Thy pleasure. Allah will say: You have told a lie. You acquired knowledge so that you might be called "a scholar," and you recited the Qur'an so that it might be said: "He is a Qari" and such has been said. Then orders will be passed against him and he shall be dragged with his face downward and cast into the Fire. Then will be brought a man whom Allah had made abundantly rich and had granted every kind of wealth. He will be brought and Allah will make him recount His blessings and he will recount them and (admit having enjoyed them in his lifetime). Allah will (then) ask: What have you done (to requite these blessings)? He will say: I spent money in every cause in which Thou wished that it should be spent. Allah will say: You are lying. You did (so) that it might be said about (You): "He is a generous fellow" and so it was said. Then will Allah pass orders and he will be dragged with his face downward and thrown into Hell.
[4689]
This tradition has been handed down through a different chain of transmitters.
[4690]
It has been narrated on the authority of 'Abdullah b. 'Amr that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: A troop of soldiers who fight in tile way of Allah and get their share of the booty receive in advance two-thirds of their reward in the Hereafter and only one-third will remain (to their credit). If they do not receive any booty, they will get their full reward.
[4691]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abdullah b. Amr (through a different chain of transmitters) that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: A troop of soldiers, large or small, who fight (in the way of Allah), get their share of the booty and return safe and sound, receive in advance two-thirds of their reward (only one-third remaining to their credit to be received in the Hereafter); and a troop of soldiers, large or small, who return empty-handed and are afflicted or wounded, will receive their full reward (in the Hereafter).
[4692]
It has been narrated on the authority of Umar b. al-Khattab that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: (The value of) an action depends on the intention behind it. A man will be rewarded only for what he intended. The emigration of one who emigrates for the sake of Allah and His Messenger (may peace be upon him) is for the sake of Allah and His Messenger (may peace be upon him); and the emigration of one who emigrates for gaining a worldly advantage or for marrying a woman is for what he has emigrated.
[4693]
It has been narrated through a different chain of transmitters on the authority of Sufyan who said that he heard 'Umar b. al-Khattab relate (this tradition) from the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) while he was delivering a sermon from the pulpit.
[4694]
It has been narrated on the authority of Anas b. Malik that the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) said: Who seeks martyrdom with sincerity shall get its reward, though he may not achieve it.
[4695]
It has been reported on the authority of Sahl b. Aba Umama b. Sahl b. Hunaif who learned the tradition from his father who (in turn) learned it from his grandfather-that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Who sought martyrdom with sincerity will be ranked by Allah among the martyrs even if he died on his bed. In his version of the tradition Abd Tahir did not mention the words: "with sincerity".
[4696]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: One who died but did not fight in the way of Allah nor did he express any desire (or determination) for Jihid died the death of a hypocrite.
'Abdullah b. Mubarak said : We think the hadith pertained to the time of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him).
[4697]
It has been narrated on the authority of Jabir who said : We were with the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) on an expedition. He said: There are some people in Medina. They are with you whenever you cover a distance or cross a valley. They have been detained by illness.
[4698]
In a version of the tradition narrated on the authority of A'mash, we have the words: "They will share with you the reward (for Jihid)."
[4699]
It has been reported on the authority of Anas b. Malik that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used to visit Umm Haram daughter of Milhan (who was the sister of his foster-mother or his father's aunt). She was the wife of 'Ubada b. Samit, One day the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) paid her a visit. She entertained him with food and then sat down to rub his head. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) dozed off and when he woke up (after a while), he was laughing. She asked: What made you laugh. Messenger of Allah? He said: Some people from my Umma were presented to me who were fighters in the way of Allah and were sailing in this sea. (Gliding smoothly on the water), they appeared to be kings or like kings (sitting) on thrones (the narrator has a doubt about the actual expression used by the Holy Prophet). She said : Messenger of Allah, pray to Allah that He may include me among these warriors. He prayed for her. Then he placed his head (down) and dozed off (again). He woke up laughing, as before. (She said) I said: Messenger of Allah, what makes you laugh? He replied: A people from my Umma were presented to me. They were fighters in Allah's way. (He described them in the same words as he had described the first warriors.) She said: Messenger of Allah, pray to God that He may include me among these warriors. He said: You are among the first ones.
Umm Haram daughter of Milhan sailed in the aea in the time of Mu'awiya. When she came out of the sea and (was going to mount a riding animal) she fell down and died.
[4700]
It has been narrated on the authority of Umm Haram (and she was the aunt of Anas) who said: The Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) came to us one day and had a nap in our house. When he woke up, he was laughing. I said: Messenger of Allah, what made you laugh? He said: I saw a people from my followers sailing on the surface of the sea (looking) like kings (sitting) on their thrones. I said: Pray to Allah that He may include me among them. He said: You will hip among them. He had a (second) ntip, woke up and was laughing. I asked him (the reason for his laughter). He gave the same reply. I said: Pray to Allah that He may include me among them. He said: You are among the first ones. Anas said: 'Ubada b. Samit married her. He joined a naval expedition and took her along with him. When she returned, a mule was brought for her. While mounting it she fell down, broke her neck (and died).
[4701]
It has been reported on the authority of Umm Haram daughter of Milhan (through another chain of transmitters). She said: One day the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) slept (at a place) near me. He woke up smiling. She said : Messenger of Allah. what made thee laugh ? He said: A people from my followers were presented to me. They were sailing on the surface of this green sea... (here follows the tradition that has gone before).
[4702]
It has been reported by 'Abdullah b. 'Abd al-Rahman that he heard Anas b. Malik say: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) paid a visit to Milhan's daughter, maternal aunt of Anas (and the sister of the Holy Prophet's foster-mother). He placed his head near her (from this point onward, the narrator carried on the previous tradition to its end).
[4703]
It has been narrated on the authority of Salman who said: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: Keeping watch for a day and a night is better (in point of reward) than fasting for a whole month and standing in prayer every night. If a person dies (while, performing this duty), his (meritorious) activity will continue and he will go on receiving his reward for it perpetually and will be saved from the torture of the grave.
[4704]
This tradition has been handed down on the authority of Salman al-Khair through another chain of transmitters.
[4705]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira that the, Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: While a man walks along a path, finds a thorny twig lying on the way and puts it aside, Allah would appreciate it and forgive him The Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) said: The martyrs are of five kinds: one who dies of plague; one who dies of diarrhoea (or cholera); one who is drowned; one who is buried under debris and one who dies fighting in the way of Allah.
[4706]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira (through another chain of transmitters) that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: Whom do you consider to be a martyr among you? They (the Companions) said: Messenger, of Allah, one who is slain in the way of Allah is a martyr. He said: Then (if this is the definition of a martyr) the martyrs of my Umma will be small in number. They asked: Messenger of Allah, who are they? He said: One who is slain in the way of Allah is a martyr; one who dies in the way of Allah, is a martyr; one who dies of plague is a martyr; one who dies of cholera is a martyr.
Ibn Miqsam said: I testify the truth of your father's statement (with regard to this tradition) that the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) said: One who is drowned is a martyr.
[4707]
A version of the tradition narrated on the authority of Suhail contains the additional words: "And one who is drowned is a martyr."
[4708]
Another version of the tradition narrated on the authority of Suhail thouch a different chain of transmitters contains the additional words: "A drowned person is a martyr."
[4709]
It has been narrated on the authority of Hafsa daughter of Sirin who said: Anas b. Malik asked me the cause of death of Yahya b. 'Abu 'Amra. I said: (He died) of plague. He said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said that death by plague is martyrdom for a Muslim.
[4710]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Asim through the same chain of transmitters.
[4711]
It has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Amir who said: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say-and he was delivering a sermon from the pulpit : Prepare to meet them with as much strength as you can afford. Beware, strength consists in archery. Beware, strength consists in archery. Beware, strength consists in archery.
[4712]
It has been narrated on the authority of Uqba b. Amir who said: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: Lands shall be thrown open to you and Allah will suffice you (against your enemies), but none of you should give up playing with his arrows.
[4713]
This tradition has also been narrated on the same authority through another chain of transmitters.
[4714]
It has been reported by 'Abd al-Rahman b. Shamasa that Fuqaim al- Lakhmi said to Uqba b. Amir: You frequent between these two targets and you are an old man, so you will be finding it very hard. 'Uqba said: But for a thing I heard from the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him), I would not strain myself. Harith (one of the narrators in the chain of transmitters) said: I asked Ibn Shamasa: What was that? He said that he (the Holy Prophet) said: Who learnt archery and then gave it up is not from us. or he has been guilty of disobedience (to Allah's Apostle).
[4715]
It has been narrated on the authority of Thauban that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: A group of people from mv Umma will always remain triumphant on the right path and continue to be triumphant (against their opponents). He who deserts them shall not be able to do them any harm. They will remain in this position until Allah's. Command is executed (i.e. Qayamah is established). In Qutaiba's version of the tradition, we do not have the words : "They will remain in this position."
[4716]
It has been narrated on the authority of Mughira who said: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: A group of people from my Umma will continue to be triumphant over the people until the Command of Allah overtakes them while they are still triumphant. The same tradition has been narrated through another chain of transmitters on the same authority.
[4717]
It has been narrated on the authority of Jabir b. Samura that the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) said: This religion will continue to exist, and a group of people from the Muslims will continue to fight for its protection until the Hour is established.
[4718]
It has been narrated on the authority of Jabir b. 'Abdullah who said: I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: A group of people from my Umma will continue to fight In defence of truth and remain triumphant until the Day of judgment.
[4719]
It his been narrated on the authority of Umair b. Umm Hani who said: I heard Mu'awiya say (while delivering a sermon from the pulpit) that he heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say: A group of people from my Umma will continue to obey Allah's Command, and those who desert or oppose them shall not be able to do them any harm. They will be dominating the peeple until Allah's Command is executed (i.e. Resurrection is established).
[4720]
It has been related by, Yazid b. al-Asamm that he heard Mu'awiya b. Abu Sfyan quote a tradition from the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) which he related from the Prophet (mail peace he upon him)-and he did not hear him quote from the Holy Prophet (masy peace be upon him) any tradition other than this in the course of his sermon from the pulpit-that whom Allah wants to do a favour, He grants him an understanding of religion. A group of people from the Muslims will remain on the Right Path and continue until the Day of Judgment to triumph over those who oppose them.
[4721]
It has been narrated on the authority of 'Abd al-Rahman b. Shamasa al- Mahri who said : I was in the company of Maslama b. Mukhallad, and 'Abdullah b. 'Amr b. 'As was with him. 'Abdullah said: The Hour shall some oniy when the worst type of people are left on the earth. They will be worse than the people of pre-Islamic days. They will get whatever they ask of Allah. While we were yet sitting when 'Uqba b. 'Amir came, and Maslama said to him: 'Uqba, listen to what 'Abdullah says. 'Uqba said: He knows better; so far as I am concerned, I heard the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) say : A group of people from my Umma will continue to fight in obedience to the Command of Allah, remaining dominant over their enemies. Those who will oppose them shall not do them any harm. They will remain ill this condition until the Hour overtakes them. (At this) 'Abdullah said : Yes. Then Allah will raise a wild which will be fragrant like musk and whose touch will be like the touch of silk ; (but) it will cause the death of all (faithful) persons, not leaving behind a single person with an iota of faith in his heart. Then only the worst of men will remain to be overwhelmed by the Hour.
[4722]
It has been narrated by Sa'd b. Abu Waqqas that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said : The people of the West will continue to triumphantly follow the truth until the Hour is established.
[4723]
It has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When you journey through a fertile land, you should (go slow and) give the camels a chance to graze in the land. When you travel In an arid (land) where there is scarcity of vegetation, you should quicken their pace (lest your camels grow feeble and emaciated for lack of fodder). When you halt for the night, avoid (pitching your tent on) the road, for it is the abode of noxious little animals at night.
[4724]
It has been narrated (through another chain of transmitters) on the authority of Abu Huraira that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: When you travel (through a land) where there is plenty of vegetation, you should (go slow and) give the camels a chance to enjoy the benefit of the earth. When you travel (through a land) where there is scarcity of vegetation, you should hasten with them (so that you may be able to cross that land while your animals ore still in a good condition of health). When you make a halt for the night, avoid (doing so on) the road, for the tracks are the pathways of wild beasts or the abode of noxious little animals.
[4725]
On the authority of Abu Huraira that the Prophet (may peace be upon him) said: Travelling is a tortuous experience. It deprives a person of his sleep. his food and drink. When one of you has accomplished his purpose, he should hasten his return to his family.
[4726]
It has been narrated on the authority of Anas b. Malik that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) would not come (back) to his family by night. He would come to them in the morning or in the evening. Another version of the tradition narrated on the some authority is a little difierently worded. It says: (He) would not enter (upon his household at night).
[4727]
It has been narrated on the authority of Jabir b. 'Abdullah who said: We accompanied the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) on an expedition. When we came (back) to Medina and were going to enter our houses, he said: Wait and enter (your houses) in the later part of the evening so that a woman with dishevelled hair may have used the comb, and a woman whose husband has been away from home may have removed the hair from her private parts.
[4728]
It has been narrated on the authority of Jabir that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: If one of you comes (back from a journey) at night. he should not enter his house as a night visitor (but should wait) until a woman whose husband has been away from house has removed the hair from her private parts and a woman with dishevelled hair has combed her hair.
[4729]
This tradition has been handed down through another chain of transmitters.
[4730]
It has been narrated (through a different chain of tranmitten) on the authority of Jabir who said: The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade that a man should come to his family like (an unexpected) night visitor doubting their fidelity and spying into their lapses.
[4731]
A version of the tradition narrated on the authority of Jabir (but through a different chain of transmitters) mentions the undesirability of coining to one's house like a night visitor, but does not contain the words: "Doubting their fidelity or spying into their lapses."
[4732]
'Adi b. Hatim reported: I said: Messenger of Allah, I set off trained dogs and they catch for me (the game) and I recite the came of Allah over it (I slaughter the game by reciting Bismillah-i-Allah-o-Akbar), whereupon he said: When you set off your trained dogs and you recited the name of Allah (while setting them off), then eat (the game). I said: Even if them (the trained dogs) kill that (the game)? He (the Holy Prophet) said: Even if these kill, but (on the condition) that no other dog, which you did not set off (along with your dogs), participates (in catching the game). I said to him: I throw Mi'rad, a heavy featherless blunt arrow, for hunting and killing (the game). Thereupon he said: When you throw Mi'rad, and it pierces, then eat, but if it falls flatly (and beats the game to death), then do not eat that.
[4733]
'Adi b. Hatim reported: I asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) saying: We are a people who hunt with these (trained) dogs, then (what should we do)? Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: When you set of your trained dogs having recited the name of Allah, then eat what these (hounds) have caught for you, oven if it (the game) is killed, provided (the hunting dog) has not eaten (any part of the game). If it has eaten (the game), then you don't eat it as I fear that it might have caught for its own self. And do not eat in case other dogs have joined your trained dogs.
[4734]
'Adi b. Hatim reported that he asked the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about (hunting) with the help of an arrow having a stub end. He said: If it strikes (the game) with its point, then eat, but if it strikes flatly and it dies, that is Waqidh (beaten into death), do not eat that. I asked the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) about (hunting with the help of) dogs, whereupon he said. When you send your dog (for hunting) reciting the name of Allah, then eat (the game), but if some part of it is eaten (by the dogs, then do not eat that, for it (your dog) has caught that (the-game) for itself. I (again) said: If I find along with my dog another dog, and do not know which of (the dogs) has caught (the game). then (what should I do) ? Thereupon he ('Allah's Messenger) said: Then don't eat that, for you recited the name of Allah on your dog and not on the other one.
[4735]
Adi b. Hatim reported: I asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) about Mi'rad (i.e. hunting with the help of arrow having a stub end, and he stated the same (as we find in the previous hadith).
[4736]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of 'Adi b. Hatim with a slight variation of words.
[4737]
'Adi b. Hatim reported: I asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) about hunting the game with the help of Mi'rad, whereupon he said: If it strikes (the game) with its point, then eat it,but if it strikes flat, that is (the game is) beaten (into death), (then do not eat that) 'Adi further said: I asked him about hunting with the help of a dog, whereupon he said: If that (the dog) catches it (the game) for you and does not eat out of that, then you eat (the game) for Dhakat (slaughtering) of that is its being caught by it (by the dog). But if you find another dog besides it, and you fear that that dog (the second one) had caught it (the game) along with that (your dog) and killed it. then don't eat; for you recited the name of Allah on your dog and did not recite that on the other one (which joined your dog incidentally).
[4738]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zakariya b. Abu Za'ida with the same chain of transmitters.
[4739]
Sha'bi reported: I heard Adi b. Hatim say-and he was our neighbour, and our partner and co worker at Nahrain-that he asked Allah's Apostle (may peace he upon him) saying: I let off my dog and find another dog along with my dog and that (any one of them) catches the (game), but I do not know which one had caught it, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Then don't eat that, for you recited the name of Allah while letting off your dog and did not recite on the other.
[4740]
This hadith has been narrated oif the authority of 'Adi b. Hatim through another chain of transmitters.
[4741]
Adi b. Hatim reported: Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) said to me: When you let off your dog, recite the name of Allah, and if it catches (game for you) and you find it alive, then slaughter it; if you find it killed and that (your dog) has eaten nothing out of that, (even then) you may eat it; but if you find along with your dog another dog, and (the game an) dead, then don't eat, for you do not know which of the two has killed it. And if you shoot your arrow, recite the name of Allah, but if it (game) goes out of your sight for a day and you do not find on that but the mark of your arrow, then eat that it you so like, but if you find it drowned in water, then don't eat that.
[4742]
'Adi b. Hatim reported: I asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) about hunting. He said: When you shoot your arrow, recite the name of Allah, and if you find it (the arrow) killed (that). then eat, except when you find it fallen into water, for in that case you do not know whether it is water that caused its death or your arrow.
[4743]
Abu Tha'laba al-Khushani reported: I came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, we are in the land of the People of the Book, (so) we eat in their utensils, and (live) in a hunting region. where I hunt with, the help of my bow, and hunt with my trained dog, or with my dog which is not trained. So inform me what is lawful (Halal) for us out of that. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Regarding what you have mentioned of the fact that you live in the land belonging to the People of the Book and so you eat in their utensils, but if you can get utensils other than theirs, then don't eat in them; but if you do not find any, then wash them and eat in them. And regarding what you have mentioned about (your living) in a hunting region, what you hunt, (strike) with the help of your bow, recite the name of Allah (while shooting an arrow) and then eat; and what you catch with the help of your trained dog,recite the name of Allah (while letting oil) the dog and then eat it, and what you get with the help of your untrained dog, (if you find it alive) and slaughter it (according to the law of the Shari'ah), eat it.
[4744]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Haiwa with the same chain of transmitters, but with a slight variation of words.
[4745]
Abu Tha'laba reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said this: If you shoot with your arrow and (the game) goes out of your sight and you find it(later on), then eat that if it has not gone rotten.
[4746]
Abu Tha'laba reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying about one who comes three days later on the game he has shot: Eat it, provided it has not gone rotten.
[4747]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Tha'laba al- Khushani with a slight variation of (words): He (the Holy Prophet) said in regard to the game killed by (a trained) dog: Eat after three days provided it has not gone rotten.
[4748]
Abu Tha'laba reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon prohibited the eating of every fanged beast of prey. Zuhri added: We did not bear of it until we came to Syria.
[4749]
Abu Tha'laba al-Khushani reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) prohibited the eating of all fanged beasts. Ibn Shihab said: I did not bear of this from our 'Ulama' in the Hijaz, until Abu Idris narrated that to me and he was one of the jurists of Syria.
[4750]
Abu Tha'laba al-Khushani reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having prohibited the eating of all fanged beasts of prey. This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters, but with a slight variation of words.
[4751]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The eating of all fanged beasts of prey is unlawful. This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters.
[4752]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) prohibited the eating of all fanged beasts of prey, and all the birds having talons.
[4753]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Shu'ba.
[4754]
Ibn Abbas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade (the eating) of all the fanged beasts of prey, and of all the birds having talons.
[4755]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn 'Abbas through a different chain of transmitters.
[4756]
Jabir reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) sent us (on an expedition) and appointed Abu 'Ubaida our chief that we might intercept a caravan of the Quraish and provided us with a bag of dates. And he found for us nothing besides it. Abu Ubaida gave each of us one date (everyday). I (Abu Zubair, one of the narrators) said: What did you do with that? He said: We sucked that just as a baby sucks and then drank water over that, and it sufficed us for the day until night. We beat off leaves with the help of our staffs, then drenched them with water and ate them. We then went to the coast of the sea, and there rose before us on the coast of the sea something like a big mound. We came near that and we found that it was a beast, called al-'Anbar (spermaceti whale). Abu 'Ubaida said. It is dead. He then said: No (but it does not matter), we have been sent by the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in the path of Allah and you are hard pressed (on account of the scarcity of food), so you eat that. We three hundred in number stayed there for a month, until we grew bulky. He (Jabir) said: I saw how we extracted pitcher after pitcher full of fat from the cavity of its eye, and sliced from it compact piece of meat equal to a bull or like a bull. Abu 'Ubaida called forth thirteen men from us and he made them sit in the cavity of its eye, and he took hold of one of the ribs of its chest and made it stand and then saddled the biggest of the camels we had with us and it passed under it (the arched rib), and we provided ourselves with pieces of boiled meat (especially for use in our journey). When we came back to Medina, we went to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and made a mention of that to him, whereupon he said: That was a provision which Allah had brought forth for you. Is there any piece of meat (left) with you, so tnat you give to us that ? He (Jabir) said: We sent to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) tome of that (a piece of meat) and he ate it.
[4757]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) sent us (on an expedition). We were three hundred riders and our chief (leader) was 'Ubaida b. al-Jarrah. We were on the look out for a caravan of the Quraish. So we stayed on the coast for half a month, and were so much afflicted by extreme hunger that we (were obliged) to eat leaves. That is why it was called the Detachment of the Leaves. The ocean cast out for us an animal which was called al-'Anbar (whale). We ate of that for half of the month and rubbed its fat on our (bodies) until our bodies became stout. Abu 'Ubaida caught hold of one of its ribs and fixed that up. He then cast a glance at the tallest man of the army and the highest of the camels. and then made him ride over that, and that-tnan passed beneath it (the rib), and many a man could sit in its eye-socket, and we extracted many pitchers of fat from the cavity of its eye. We had small bags containing dates with us (before finding the whale). 'Ubaida gave every person amongst us a handful of dates (and when the provision ran short), he then gave each one of us one date. And when that (stock) was exhausted, we felt its loss.
[4758]
'Amr reported on the authority of Jabir that in the expedition of Khabat (leaves) a person slaughtered three camels, then three, then three, then Abu 'Ubaida forbade him (to do so fearing that the rides may become short).
[4759]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) sent us (on an expedition), and we were three hundred in number, and we were carrying our bags of provisions around our necks.
[4760]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent on in expedition a detachment consisting of three hundred (persons) and appointed Abu 'Ubaida b. Jarrah as their chief. Their provisions ran short: 'Abu 'Ubaida collected their provisions in the provision bag. and he fed us (for some time). Later on when the provisions ran short he gave us one date every day.
[4761]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent an expedition to the sea coast and I was one among them. The rest of the hadith is the same with a slight variation of wording that in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Wahb b. Kaisan (the words are): "The army ate out of that (the whale) for eighteen days."
[4762]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent an expedition to the land of the tribe of Juhaina, and appointed a person as a chief over them.
[4763]
'Ali b. Abi Talib reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade on the Day of Khaibar temporary marriage (Muta') with women and the eating of the flesh of domestic asses.
[4764]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri through a different chain of transmitters with a slight variation of wording.
[4765]
Abu Tha'laba reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) prohibited (the eating) of the flesh of domestic asses.
[4766]
Ibn Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) forbade the eating of the flesh of domestic asses.
[4767]
Ibn 'Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the eating of the (flesh) of domestic asses on the Day of Khaibar in spite of the fact that people needed that.
[4768]
Shaibani reported: I asked 'Abdullah b. Abu Aufa about (the lawfulness or unlawfulness of) the flesh of the domestic asses. He said: We experienced hunger on the Day of Khaibar as we were with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). We found domestic asses in the exterior of Medina. We slaughtered them and our earthen pots were boiling when the announcer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) made an announcement that the earthen pots should be turned upside down and nothing of the flesh of the domestic asses should be eaten. I said: What kind of prohibition is it that he (the Holy Prophet) has made? He said: We discussed it amongst -ourselves. Some of us aaid that it has been declared unlawful for ever, (whereas others said) it has been declared unlawful since one-fifth (of the booty) has not been given (to the treasury, as is legally required).
[4769]
Sulaiman Shaibini reported: I heard Abdullah b. Abu Aufa say: We were smitten with hunger during the nights of Khaibar. On the Day of Khaibar, we fell upon domestic asses and we slaughtered them, and when our earthen pots boiled with them, the announcer of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) made an annoancement that the earthen pots should be turned over, and nothing should be eaten of the flesh of the domestic asses. Some of the people said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had forbidden (the use of this flesh) for one-fifth (due to the State) has not been paid, while others said: He prohibited it for ever.
[4770]
'Adi (he was the son of Thabit) said: I heard al-Bara' and 'Abdullah b. Abu Aufa say: We found domestic asses and we cooked them. Then the announcer of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) made an announcement that the earthen pots should be turned over.
[4771]
Al-Bara' said: We found on the Day of Khaibar domestic asses, and the announcer of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) made an announcement that the earthen pots should be turned over.
[4772]
Bara was heard saying: We were forbidden (to eat) the flesh of the domestic asses.
[4773]
Bara' b. 'Azib reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded us to throw away the flesh of domestic asses whether uncooked or cooked; he then never commanded us to eat that. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Asim with the same chain of transmitters.
[4774]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: I do not know whether Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) prohibited (the eating of the domestic ass) due to the fact that they were the beasts of burden for the people, so he (the Holy Prophet) did not like their beasts of burden to be destroyed (as a matter of expediency), or he prohibited the use of the flesh of domestic asses (not as an expediency but as a law of the Shari'ah) on the Day of Khaibar.
[4775]
Salama b. Akwa' reported : We went to Khaibar with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). Then Allah granted (us) victory over them. On that very evening of the day when they had been granted victory, they lit many fires. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: What are those fires and what for those have been lit? They said: (These have been lit) for (cooking) the flesh. Thereupon he said: Of what flesh? They said : For the flesh of the domestic asses. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace bo upon him) said: Throw that away and break them (the earthen pots in which the fiesa was being cooked). A person said: Messenger of Allah, should we throw it away and wash them (the cooking pots)? He said : You may do so.
[4776]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Yazid b. Abu Ubaid.
[4777]
Anas reported: When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) conquered Khaibar, we caught hold of the asses outside the village. We cooked them (their flesh). Then the announcer of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) made the announcement: Listen, verily Allah and His Messenger have prohibited you (the eating of) their (flesh), for it is a loathsome evil of Satan's doing. Then the earthen pots were turned over along with what was in them, and these were brimming (with flesh) at that time.
[4778]
Anas b. Malik reported: When it was the Day of Khaibar a visitor came and said: Messenger of Allah, the asses have been eaten. Then another came and said:Messenger of Allah, the asses are being destroyed. Then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded Abu Talha to make an announcement that Allah and His Messenger have prohibited you (from eating) of the flesh of (domestic) asses, for these are loathsome or impure. He (the narrator) said : The earthein pots were turned over along with what was in them.
[4779]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) prohibited eating of the flesh of domestic asses on the Day of Khaibar, and permitted the cooking of the flesh of horses.
[4780]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah is reported to have said : We ate during the time of Khaibar the (flesh) of horses and of wild asses, but Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) prohibited us (to eat) the flesh of domestic asses. This hadith has hen transmitted on the authority of Ibn Juraij.
[4781]
Asma' reported: We slaughtered a horse and ate it during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[4782]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Hisham.
[4783]
Ibn 'Umar reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was asked about the eating of (the flesh) of the lizard, whereupon he said: I am neither the eater of it nor its prohibitor.
[4784]
Ibn 'Umar reported: A person asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) about the eating of the lizard, whereupon he said. I neither eat it, nor do I prohibit it.
[4785]
Ibn 'Umar reported that a person asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as he was sitting on the pulpit about the eating of the lizard, whereupon he said: I neither eat it, nor do I prohibit it.
[4786]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Ubaidullah with the same chain of transmitters.
[4787]
A hadith pertaining to the eating of the lizard is transmitted from the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) on the authority of Ibn 'Umar, but in this very hadith narrated through a different chain of transmitters there is a slight variation of wording (and the words are): "A lizard was brought to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) but he neither ate that nor declared it unlawful." And in the hadith transmitted through Usama (the words are): "The man (inquirer) was standing in the mosque and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was sitting on the pulpit."
[4788]
Ibn 'Umar reported that there were some persons with Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) from among his Companions, Sa'd being one of them. There was brought to them the flesh of the lizard when a lady amongst the wives of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: It is the flesh of the lizard. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) &aid: Eat, for it is lawful, but it is not my diet.
[4789]
Taubat Al-'Anbari reported: Al-Sha'bi (one of the narrators) asked me if I had heard the hadith transmitted on the authority of Hasan from the Prophet (may peace be upon him). He said: I sat in the company if Ibn 'Umar for two years or a year and a half but I did not hear narrated from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) but this one (pertaining to the flesh of the lizard) as narrated by Mu'adh.
[4790]
'Abdullah b. 'Abbas reported: I and Khalid b. Walid went to the apartment of Maimuna along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and there was presented to him a roasted lizard. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stretched his hand towards It, whereupon some of the women who had been in the house of Maimuna said: Inform Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) what he intends to eat. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) lifted his hand. I said: Messenger of Allah, Is it forbidden? He said: No. It is not found in the land of my people, and I feel that I have no liking for it. Khalid said: I then chewed and ate it, while, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was looking (at me).
[4791]
'Abdullah b. 'Abbas reported that Khalid b. Walid who is called the Sword of Allah had informed him that he visited Maimuna, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), in the company of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and she was the sister of his mother (that of Khalid) and that of 'Ibn Abbas, and he found with her a roasted lizard which her sister Hufaida the daughter of al-Harith had brought from Najd, and she presented that lizard to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). It was rare that some food was presented to the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) and it was not mentioned or named. While Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was about to stretch forth his hand towards the lizard, a woman from amongst the women present there informed the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) what they had presented to him. They said: Messenger of Allah, it is a lizard. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) withdrew his hand, whereupon Khalid b. Walid said: Messenger of Allah, is a lizard forbidden ? There opon he said: No, but it is not found in the land of my people, and I feel that I have no liking for it. Khalid said: I then chewed and ate it, and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was looking at me and he did not forbid (me to eat it).
[4792]
Khalid b. Walid reported that he visited Maimuna daughter of al-Harith with the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), and she was the sister of his mother. She presented to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) the flesh of a lizard which Umm Hufaid daughter of al-Harith had brought from Najd, and she had been married to a person belonging to Banu Ja'far. It was the habit of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) not to eat anything until he knew what that was. The rest of the hadith is the same but with this (addition): "Ibn al-Asamm narrated it from Maimuna and he was under her care."
[4793]
Ibn 'Abbas reported: While we were in the house of Maimuna there were brought to Allah's Messenger two roasted lizards. Here no mention is made of al- 'Asamm narrating from Maimuna.
[4794]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that there had been brought to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) the flesh of a lizard and Khalid b. Walid was also present there. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[4795]
Sa'id b. Jubair reported that he heard Ibn 'Abbas says: The sister of my mother Umm Hufaid presented to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) clarified butter (ghee), cheese and some lizards. He ate out of the clarified butter and cheese, but lett the lizard finding no liking for it. But it was eaten on the table of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). Had it been forbidden (haram), it could not be eaten on the table of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[4796]
Yazid b. al-Asamm reported: A newly wedded person of Medina invited us to a wedding feast, and he served us thirteen lizards. There were those who ate it and those who abandoned it. I met Ibn 'Abbas the next day, and informed him (about this) in the presence of many persons. Some of them said that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) had observed: I neither eat it nor forbid (anyone) from eating it, nor declare it to be unlawful. Thereupon Ibn 'Abbas said: Sad it is what you say ! Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) has not been sent, but (to declare in clear words) the lawful and the unlawful (things). We were once with Allah's Messenger (may peace be.upon him) as he was with Maimuna, and there were with him al-Fadl b. 'Abbas, Khalid b. Walid and some women (also) when a tray of food containing flesh was presented to him. As Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) was about to eat that, Maimuna said: It is the flesh of the lizard. He withdrew his hand saying: That is the flesh which I never eat; but he said to them (those who were present there): You may eat. Al-Fadl ate out of that, so did Khalid b Walid, and the women. Maimuna (however) said: I do not eat anything but that which Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) eats.
[4797]
Abu Zubair reported that he heard Jabir b. 'Abdullah saying that there was presented to Allah's Messenger (the flesh) of the lizard, but he refused to eat that, saying: I do not know; perhaps it (lizard) might (be one of those natives of) the distant past whose (forms) had beer, distorted.
[4798]
Abu Zubair reported: I asked Jabir about ithe eating) of the lizard, whereupon he said: Don't eat that as he (the Holy Prophet) felt disgust. He (the narrator) said that Umar b. al-Khattab reminded: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) did not declare it to be unlawful. Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, has (made it a source) of benefit for more than one (persons). It is a common diet of the shepherds. Had it been with me, I would have eaten that.
[4799]
Abu Sa'id reported that a person said: Messenger of Allah, we live in a land abounding in lizards, so what do you command or what verdict you give (about eating of it) ? Thereupon he said: It was mentioned to me that a people from among Bani Isra'il were distorted (so there is a likelihood that those people might have been distorted in the shape of lizards). So he neither commanded (us to eat that) nor forbade (us). Abu Sa'id said: After some time Umar said: Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, has made it (a source of) benefit for more than one (person), for it is the common diet of shepherds. Had it been with me, I would have eaten that. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) disliked it.
[4800]
Abu Sa'id reported that an Arab of the desert came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: I live in a low land abounding in lizards, and these are the common diet of my family, but he (the Holy Prophet) did not make any reply. We said to him: Repeat it (your problem) and so he repeated it, but he did not make any reply. (It was repeated thrice ) Then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) called him out at the third time saying: O man of the desert, verily Allah cursed or showed wrath to a tribe of Bani Isra'il and distorted them to beasts which move on the earth. I do not know, perhaps this (lizard) may be one of them. So I do not eat it, nor do I prohibit the eating of it.
[4801]
Ibn Abu Aufa reported: We went on seven expeditions with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and ate locusts.
[4802]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Ya'fur with the same chain of transmitters. Abu Bakr (one of the narrators) said "seven expeditions," whereas Ishaq said "six," and Ibn Umar said "six" or "seven".
[4803]
This hadith is narrated on the authority of Abu Ya'fur with the same chain of transmitters, and he mentioned seven expeditions.
[4804]
Anas b. Malik reported: We chased a hare at Marr az-Zahrin (a valley near Mecca). They (my companions) ran, but felt exhausted; I also tried until I caught hold of it. I brought it to Abu Talha. He slaughtered it and sent its haunch and two hind legs to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) through me; and he accepted them. This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Yahya with a slight change of wording.
[4805]
Ibn Buraida reported that Abdullah b. al-Mughaffal saw a person from amongst his companions throwing small pebbles, whereupon he said: Don't throw pebbles. for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) did not like it, or he forbade flinging of pebbles since neither the game is taken thereby, nor an enemy defeated. but it may break a tooth or put out an eye. He, afterwards, again saw him flinging pebbles, and said to him: I inform you that the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) did not approve or he forbade flinging of pebbles, but if I see you again flinging pebbles. I will not speak with you.
[4806]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Kahmas.
[4807]
'Abdullah b. Mughaffal reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) prohibited throwing of pebbles. Ibn Ja'far reported (in the narration transmitted by him) that he (the Holy Prophet) said: It neither inflicts defeat to the enemy nor kills the game but breaks the tooth and puts the eye out. This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Ibn Mahdi with a slight variation of wording.
[4808]
Sa'id b. Jubair reported that. a near one of 'Abdullah b. Mughaffal threw pebbles. He prohibited him (to do so). He said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had prohibited the throwing of pebbles by saying: It does not catch the game, nor does it inflict defeat on the enemy, but breaks the tooth and puts the eye out. He (the near one of Abdullah b. Mughadal) again repeated it (the act of throwing of pebbles) whereupon he said: I narrate to you that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon hish) disliked and prohibited throwing of pebbles, but I see you again throwing pebbles; I (would therefore) not speak with you.
[4809]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ayyi3b with the me chain of transmitters.
[4810]
Shaddid b. Aus said: Two are the things which I remember Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: Verily Allah has enjoined goodness to everything; so when you kill, kill in a good way and when you slaughter, slaughter in a good way. So every one of you should sharpen his knife, and let the slaughtered animal die comfortably.
[4811]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Khalid al-Hadhdha' through different chains o transmitters.
[4812]
Hishim b. Zaid b. Anas b. Milik reported: I visited the house of al-Hakam b. Ayyub along with my grandfather Anas b. Milik, (and there) some people had made a hen a target and were shooting arrows at her. Thereupon Asas said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had forbidden tying of the animals (and making them the targets of arrows, etc.). This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba through other chains of transmitters.
[4813]
Ibn 'Abbas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said this: Do not make anything having life as a target.
[4814]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba through a different chain of transmitters.
[4815]
Sa'id b. Jubair reported that Ibn 'Umar happened to pass by a party of men who had tied a hen and were shooting arrows at it. As soon as they saw Ibn 'Umar, they scattered from it. Thereupon Ibn Umar said: Who has done this? Verily Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) has invoked curse upon him who does this.
[4816]
Sa'id b. Jubair reported that Ibn 'Umar happened to pass by some young men of the Quraish who had tied a bird (and th,is made it a target) at which they had been shooting arrows Every arrow that they missed came into the possession of the owner of the bird. So no sooner did they see Ibn 'Umar they went away. Thereupon Ibn 'Umar said: Who has done this ? Allah has cursed him who does this. Verily Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) invoked curse upon one who made a live thing the target (of one's marksmanship).
[4817]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade that any beast should be killed after it has been tied.
[4818]
Jundab b. Sufyan reported: I was with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) on the day of 'Id al-Adha. While he had not returned after having offered (the Id prayer) and finished it, he saw the flesh of the sacrificial animals which had been slaughtered before he had completed the prayer. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: One who slaughtered his sacrificial animal before his prayer or our prayer ('Id), he should slaughter another one in its stead, and he who did not slaughter, he should slaughter by reciting the name of Allah.
[4819]
Jundab b. Sufyan reported: I was with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) (on the occasion) of 'Id al-Adha. After he had completed the prayer with people, he found that the goats had been slaughtered, whereupon he said: He who slaughtered sacrificial animal before the prayer should slaughter a goat (again) in its stead and he who has not slaughtered he should slaughter it by reciting the name of Allah.
[4820]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of al-Aswad b. Qais with the same chain of transmitters.
[4821]
Jundab al-Bajali reported: I saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) observing ('Id) prayer on the Day of Sacrifice (10th of Dhu'l-Hijja) and then delivering a sermon and he said: He who sacrificed the (animal) before offering ('Id) prayer, he should offer again in its stead, and he who did not sacrifice the animal should slaughter it by reciting the name of Allah.
[4822]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba through another chain of transmitters.
[4823]
Al-Bara' reported: My maternal uncle Abu Burda sacrificed his animal before ('Id) prayer. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: That is a goat (slaughtered for the sake of) flesh (and not as a sacrifice on the day of Adha). He said: I have a lamb of six months. Thereupon he said: Offer it as a sacrifice, but it will not justify for anyone except you, and then said: He who sacrificed (the animal) before ('Id) prayer, he in fact slaughtered it for his own self, and he who slaughtered after prayer, his ritual of sacrifice became complete and he in fact observed the religious practice of the Muslims.
[4824]
Al-Bara' b. 'Azib reported that his maternal'uncle Abu Burda b. Niyar sacrificed his animal earlier than the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) had sacrificed. Thereupon he said: Apostle of Allah, it is the day of meat and it is not desirable (to have longing for it and not to make use of it immediately), so I hastened in offering my animal as a sacrifice, so that I might feed my family and neighbours and my kith and kin. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Offer again your sacrifice. He said: Messenger of Allah, I have a small milch goat of less than one year, and that is better than two dry goats (from which only) meat (can be acquired). Thereupon he said: That is better than the two animals of sacrifice on your behalf, and the sacrifice of a goat , of less than six months shall not be accepted as a sacrifice on behalf of anyone after your (sacrifice).
[4825]
Al-Bara' b. 'Azib reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) delivered an address on the day (of Nahr) in which he said: None of you should offer sacrifice of animals until he has completed the ('Id) prayer. Thereupon my maternal uncle said: Messenger of Allah, it is the day of meat, so it is not desirable (to keep my family in the state of longing). The rest of the hadith is the same.
[4826]
Al-Bara' reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: He who observes prayer like our prayer and turns his face towards our Qibla (in prayer) and who offers sacrifices (of animals) as we do, he must not slaughter the (animal as a sacrifice) until he has completed the prayer. Thereupon my maternal uncle said: Messenger of Allah, I have sacrificed the animal on behalf of my son. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said : This is the thing in which you have made haste for your family. He said: I have a goat with me better than two goats. Thereupon he said: Sacrifice it for that is the best.
[4827]
Al-Bara' b. 'Azib reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: The first (act) with which we started our day (the day of 'Id-ul Adha) was that we offered prayer. We then returned and sacrificed the animals and he who did that in fact adhered to our Sunnah (practice). And he who slaughtered the (animal on that day before the 'Id prayer), for him (the slaughtering of animal was directed to the acquiring of) meat for his family, and there is nothing of the sort of sacrifice in it. It was Abu Burda b. Niyar who had slaughtered (the animal before the 'Id prayer). He said: I have a small lamb, of less than one year, but better than that of more than a year. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) qaid: Sacrifice it, but it will not suffice (as a sacrifice) for anyone after you.
[4828]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of al-Bara' b. 'Azib through another chain of transmitters.
[4829]
al-Bara' b. 'Azib reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) addressed us on the day of Nahr after the ('Id) prayer. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[4830]
Al-Bara' b. 'Azib reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) addressed us on the day of Nahr and said: None should sacrifice the animal unless he has completed the ('Id) prayer. A person said: I have a milch goat of less than one year, better than two fat goats. Thereupon he said: Sacrifice it, and no goat of less than a year of age will be accepted as sacrifice after you.
[4831]
Al-Bara' b. 'Azib reported that Abu Burda slaughtered the animal as a sacrifice before the ('Id) prayer. Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Offer a substitute for it (since it does not absolve you of the responsibility of sacrifice). Thereupon he said: Allah's Messenger. I have nothing with me but a goat of less than six months. Shu'ba (one of the narrators) said: I think he (al-Bara' b. 'Azib also) said: And it is better than a goat of one year. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Make it a substitute for that (and sacrifice it), but it will not suffice for anyone (as a sacrifice) after you.
[4832]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters, but did not mention tht doubt (expressed in his statement) That is (the goat of less than a year) is better than a goat of more than one year.
[4833]
Anas (b. Malik) reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said on the day of Nahr (Sacrifice): He who slaughtered (the animal as a sacrifice) before the ('Id) prayer. should repeat it (i.e. offer another animal). Thereupon a person stood up and said: Messenger of Allah, that is the day when meat is much desired, and he also made a mention of the need of his neighbour, and perhaps Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) attested it. He (the person who had sacrificed the animal before the 'Id prayer) said: I have a goat of less than one year of age with me and I like it more than two fleshy goats; should I offer it as a sacrifice? He permitted him to do so. He (the narrator) said: I do not know whether this permission was granted to anyone else besides him or not. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) then turned towards two rams. and he slaughtered them, and the people' came to the goats and got them distributed amongst themselves (for offering them as sacrifice).
[4834]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) offered the 'Id prayer and then delivered the sermon giving the command: He who slaughtered the animal before prayer should slaughter (another animal as a sacrifice). The rest of the hadith is the same.
[4835]
Anas b. Malik reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) addressed us on the day of 'Id al-Adha. He smelt the odour of flesh and he prohibited thern from slaughtering (the animals before the 'Id prayer), saying: He who slaughtered the animals (before the 'Id prayer) should do that again (as it is not valid as a sacrifice).
[4836]
Jabir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Sacrifice only a grown-up animal, unless it is difficult for you, in which case sacrifice a ram (of even less than a year, but more than six months' age).
[4837]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) led us in the 'Id prayer in Medina on the Day of Sacrifice. Some persons slaughtered their animals ahead of him under the impression that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) had-already offered sacrifice. Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Those who had slaughtered their animals ahead of him should slaughter the other ones in their stead. And they should not sacrifice the animal before Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had sacrificed (his animal)
[4838]
Uqba b. 'Amir reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave the gifts of goats to be distributed amongst his Companions. They sacrificed them, but a lamb of one year of age was left. (Someone) made a mention of that to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him), whereupon he said: You sacrifice it.
[4839]
Amir al-Juhani reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) distributed sacrificial animals (amongst us for sacrificing them on 'Id al-Adha). So we sacrificed them. There fell to my lot a lamb of less than one year I said: Allah's Messenger, there has fallen to my lot a lamb (Jadha'a), whereupon he said: Sacrifice that.
[4840]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of 'Uqba b. 'Amir al-Juhan with a slight change of wording.
[4841]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sacrificed with his own hands two horned rams which were white with black markings reciting the name of Allah and glorifying Him (saying Allah-o-Akbar). He placed his foot on their sides (while sacrificing).
[4842]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sacrificed two horned rams of white colour with black markings over them. He also stated: I saw him sacrificing them with his own hand and saw him placing his foot on their sides, and recited the name of Allah and Glorified Him.
[4843]
Shu'ba reported: Qatada informed me that he had heard Anas saying that Allah's Messenger (may peace be npon him) sacrificed (the horned rams) and like that. I said: Did you (Qatada) hear from Anas? He said. Yes.
[4844]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Anas with a slight variation of wording.
[4845]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded that a ram with black legs, black belly and black (circles) round the eyes should be brought to him, so that he should sacrifice it. He said to 'A'isha: Give me the large knife, and then said: Sharpen it on a stone. She did that. He then took it (the knife) and then the ram; he placed it on the ground and then sacrificed it, saying: Bismillah, Allah-humma Taqabbal min Muhammadin wa Al-i-Muhammadin, wa min Ummati Muhammadin (In the name of Allah, "O Allah, accept [this sacrifice] on behalf of Muhammad and the family of Muhammad and the Umma of Muhammad").
[4846]
Rafi' b. Khadij is reported to have said: Allah's Messenger, we are going to encounter the enemy tomorrow, but we have no knives with us. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Make haste or be careful (in making arrangements for procuring knives) which would let the blood flow (and along with it) the name of Allah is also to be recited. Then eat, but not the tooth or nail. And I am going to tell you why it is not permissible to slaughter the animal with the help of tooth and bone; and as for the nail. it is a bone, and the bone is the knife of Abyssinians. He (the narrator) said: There fell to our lot as spoils of war camels and goats, and one of the camels among them became wild. A person (amongst usl struck It with an arrow which brought it under control. whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: This camel became wild like wild animals, so if you find any animal getting wild, you do the same with that
[4847]
Rafi' b. Khadij reported: While we were with Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) in Dhu'I-Hulaifa in Tihama, we got hold of goats and camels. Some persons (amongst us) made haste and boiled (the flesh of goats and camels) in their earthen pots. He then commanded and these were turned over; then he equalised ten goats for a camel. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[4848]
Rafi' b. Khadij reported from his grandfather that he said: Allah's Messenger, we are going to encounter the enemy tomorrow, but we do not have long knives with us, should we then slaughter them with the peel of the reed? The rest of the hadith is the same. (And at the end the words are): "A camel became wild (and got out of our control). We attacked it with arrows until we made it fall down." This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Sa'id b. Masruq with the same chain of transmitters with a slight variation of words.
[4849]
Rafi' b. Khadij reported that he said: Allah's Messenger, we are going to encounter the enemy tomorrow. and we do not have large knives with us. The rest of the hadith is the same, but no mention is made of this: "The people hastened and they boiled (flesh) in the earthen pots. He (the Holy Prophet),cammanded and these were turned over and the narrator narrated the whole event.
[4850]
Abu Ubaid reported: I was with 'Ali b. Abi Talib on the occasion of the 'Id day. He started with the 'Id prayer before delivering the sermon, and said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade us to eat the flesh of our sacrificial animals beyond three days.
[4851]
Abu 'Ubaid, the freed slave of Ibn Azhar, reported that he said 'Id (prayer) with Umar b. al-Khattab, and then said the 'Id (prayer) with 'Ali b. Abu Talib. He (the narrator further) reported: He led us in prayer before delivering the sermon and then addressed the people saying: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) has forbidden you to eat the flesh of your sacrificial animals beyond three nights, so do not eat that.
[4852]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters.
[4853]
Ibn 'Umar reported kllah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) having said: None of you shculd eat the flesh of his sacrificial animal beyond three days.
[4854]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Umar through another chain of transmitters.
[4855]
Ibn 'Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade that the flesh of sacrificial animals be eaten beyond three (days) Salim (son of Ibn Umar) said: Ibn 'Umar did not eat the flesh of the sacrificial animals beyond three (days). Ibn Abu 'Umar said : "Beyond three days."
[4856]
Abdullah b. Waqid reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade (people) to cat the flesh of sacrificed animals beyond three days. Abdullah b. Abu Bakr said, I made a mention of that to 'Amra, whereupon she said: He has told the truth, for I heard 'A'isha say: The poor among the people of the desert come (to the towns) on the occasion of Id al-Adha during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). Upon this Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Retain with you (the flesh) sufficing for three (days), and whatever is left out of that give in charity. After this. they (the Muslims) said: Allah's Messenger, the people make waterskins with the (hides) of their sacrificed animals and they melt fat out of them. Thereupon he said. What the then? They said: You forbade (us) to eat the flesh of sacrificial animals beyond threoq (days), whereupon he said: I forbade you for those (poor persons) who flocked (to the towns on this occasion for getting meat) but now when (this situation has improved) you may eat, preserve and give -in charity.
[4857]
Jabir reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) forbade eating of the flesh of sacrificed animals beyond three (days). but afterwards said : Eat, make a provision, and keep it.
[4858]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported : We did not eat the flesh of our sacrificial animals beyond three days in Mina. Then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) permitted us saying: Eat and make it a provision (for journey). I asked 'Ata' whether Jabir had also said: Till we came to Medina. He said: Yes.
[4859]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: We did not eat the flesh of sacrificed animals beyond three (days), but then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) commanded us to make it a provision for journey and cat it (beyond three days).
[4860]
Jabir reported: We made provision (out of the flesh of sacrificed animals for our journey) to Medina during the lifetime of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[4861]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: O people of Medina, do not eat the flesh of sacrificed animals beyond three days. Ibn al-Muthanni said: Three days. They (the Companions of the Holy Prophet) complained to the Messenger of Allah (may peace he upon him) that they had children and servants of theirs (to feed), whereupon he said: Eat, and feed others, and store, and make it a provision of food.
[4862]
Salama b. al-Akwa' reported Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) having said: He who sacrifices (animal) among you nothing should be left in his house (out of its flesh) on the morning of the third day. When it was the next year they (his Companions) said: Should we do this year as we did daring the previous year? Thereupon he said: Don't do that, for that was a year when the people were hard pressed (on account of poverty). so I wanted that the (flesh) might be distributed amongst them.
[4863]
Thauban reported that Allah's Messenger (way peace be upon him) slaughtered his sacrificial animal and then said: Thauban, make his meat usable (for journey), and I continuously served him that until he arrived in Medina.
[4864]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Mu'awiya b. Salih with the same chain of transmitters.
[4865]
Thauban, the freed slave of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to me on the occasion of Hajjat-al-Wada' (the Farewell Pilgrimage): Make the flesh usable. So I made it usable (for him) and he ate it constantly until he reached Medina. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Yabya b. Hamza with the same chain of transmitters, but he did not say: On the occasion of Hajjat-al-Wada'.
[4866]
Abdullah b. Buraida reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said this: I prohibited you from visiting the graves, but (now) you may visit them, and I prohibited you (from eating) the flesh of sacrific- ed animals beyond three days, but now keep it as long as you like. I prohibited you from the use of Nabidh except (that preoared) in dry waterskins. Now drink (Nabidh prepared in any utensil), but do not drink when it becomes intoxicant.
[4867]
Ibn Buraida, on the authority of his father, reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said this: I used to forbid you. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[4868]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: (The sacrifice of Fara' and 'Atira) has no (sanction in Islam). Ibn Rafi' made this addition in his narration that Fara' means the first-born young one of a camel.
[4869]
Umm Salama reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said this: When any one of you intending to sacrifice the animal enters in the month (of Dhu'l-Hijja) he should not get his hair or nails touched (cut). It was said to Sufyan that some of the (scholars) did not deem this hadith to be Maffu'. He said: But I deem it as Marfu' (i.e. chain of narration traceable right up to the Holy Prophet).
[4870]
Umm Salama reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: If anyone of you intends to offer sacrifice he should not get his hair cut or nails trimmed.
[4871]
Umm Salama reported (these words) directly from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him): If anyone has in his possession a sacrificial animal to offer as a sacrifice (on 'Id al-Adha), he should not get his hair cut and nails trimmed after he has entered the first days of Dhu'l Hijja
[4872]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Amr b. Muslim with the same chain of transmitters.
[4873]
Umm Salama, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) to have said: He who has a sacrificial animal with him whom (he intends) to offer as sacrifice, and he enters the month of Dhu'I-Hijja, he should not get his hair cut or nails trimmed until he has sacrificed the animal.
[4874]
'Amr b. Muslim b. 'Ammar al-Laithi reported: While we were in a bathroom just before 'Id al-Adha some of the persons tried to remove the hair with the help of hair-removing chemicals. Thereupon some of the people owning the bath (or some of the people sitting therein) said that Sa'id b. Musayyib did not approve of it, or he prohibited it. Then I met Sa'id b. Musayyib and made a mention of that to him, whereupon he said: O my nephew, this is the hadith which has been forgotten, and abandoned. Umm Salama, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), narrated to me Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said as narrated above.
[4875]
Amr b. Muslim al-Jundani reported that Ibn Musayyib had told him that it was Umm Salama, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), who had informed him of that as narrated above.
[4876]
Abu Tufail 'Amir b. Withila reported: I was in the company of 'Ali b. Abi Talib, when a person came to him, and said: What was it that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) told you in secret? Thereupon he (liadrat 'All) was enraged and said: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) did not tell me anything in secret that he hid from people, except that he told me four things. He said: Com- mader of Faithful, what are these? He said: Allah cursed him who cursed his father; Allah cursed him who sacrificed for anyone besides Allah; and Allah cursed him who accommodates an innovator (in religion) ; and Allah cursed him who changed the minarets (the boundary lines) of the land.
[4877]
Abu Tufail reported: We said to 'Ali b. Abi Talib: Inform us about something which Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) told you in secret, whereupon he said: He told me nothing in secret which he bid from people, but I heard him say: Allah cursed him who sacrificed for anyone besides Allah; and cursed him who accommodated an innovator; and Allah cursed him who cursed his parents and Allah cursed him who changed the boundary lines (of the land possessed by him).
[4878]
Abu Tufail reported: 'Ali was asked whether Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had showed special favour (by disclosing to him) a thing (which he kept secret from others). Thereupon he said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) singled us not for (disclosing to us) anything (secret) which he did not make public, (but those few things) which lie in the sheath of my sword. He drew out the written document contained in it and on that (it was mentioned): Allah cursed him who sacrificed for anyone else besides Allah ; and Allah cursed him who stole the signposts (demarcating the boundary lines of the) land; and Allah cursed him who cursed his father; and Allah cursed him who accommodated an innovator (in religion).
[4879]
'Ali b. Abu Talib reported; There fell to my lot along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) an old she-camel from the spoils of Badr. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) granted me another camel. I made them kneel down one day at the door of an Ansari, and I wanted to carry on them Idhkhir (a kind of grass) in order to sell that. There was with me a goldsmith of the tribe of Qainuqa'. I saught to give a wedding feast (on the occasion of marriage with) Fatima with the help of that (the price accrued from the sale of this grass). And Hamza b. 'Abd al-Muttalib was busy in drinking in that house in the company of a singing girl who was singing to him. She said: Hamza, get up for slaughtering the fat she-camels. Hamza attacked them with the sword and cut off their humps and ripped their haunches, and then took out their livers. I said to Ibn Shihab: Did he take out anything from the hump? He said: He cut off the humps altogether. Ibn Shihab reported 'Ali having said: I saw this (horrible) sight and it shocked me, and I came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and there was Zaid b, Haritha with him and communicated to him this news. He came in the company of Zaid and I also went along with him and he went to Hamza and he expressed anger with him. Hamza raised his eyes and said: Are you (not) but the servants of my father? Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) turned back on his heels (on hearing this) until he went away from them.
[4880]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Juraij with the same chain of transmitters.
[4881]
Husain b. 'Ali reported 'Ali having said: There fell to my lot a she-camel out of the spoils of war on the Day of Badr, and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave me (another) she-camel on that day out of the Khums (one-fifth reserved for Allah and His Messenger). When I made up my mind to consummate my marriage with Fatima, the daughter of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), I prevailed upon a goldsmith of the tribe of Qainuqa' to go along with me so that we might bring Idhkhir wishing to sell that to the goldsmiths and thus I should be able to arrange my wedding feast. While I was arranging the equipments. i.e. litters, sacks and ropes, my two she-camels were sitting down at the side of the apartment of a person of the Ansar. I collected (the different articles of equipment) and found to my surprise that their humps had been chopped off and their haunches had been cut off and their livers had been taken out. I could not help weeping when I saw that plight of theirs. I said: Who has done that? They said: Hamza b. 'Abd al-Muttalib has done this. and he is in this house dead drunk in the company of some of the Ansair with asinging girl singing before him and his companions. She said in her song: O Hamza. get up and attack these falty she-camels. Thereupon Hamza stood up with a sword (in his hand) and cut off their humps and ripped their haunches and tore out their livers. 'Ali said: I went away until I came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and there was with him Zaid b. Haritha. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) recognised from my face what I had experienced, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: What has happened to you? I said: Messenger of Allah, by Allah, I have never seen (such an unfortunate day) as this day. Hamza has committed aggression to my she-camels, and has cut off their humps. and ripped their haunches, and he is in a house in the company of some drunkards. (Hearing this) Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent for his mantle and, putting it on him, he proceeded, and I and Zaid b. Haritha followed him, until he came to the door (of the house) in which there was Hamza. He (the Holy Prophet) sought permission which they granted him. and they were all drunk. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) began to reprimand Hamza for what he had done. Hamza's eyes were red. He cast a glance at Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and then looked towards his knees. and then lifted his eyes and cast a glance at his waist and then lifted his eyes and saw his face. And then Hamza said: Are you anything but the slaves of my father? Alah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to know that he was intoxicated, and he thus turned upon his heels, and came out, and we also came out along with him.
[4882]
Anas b. Malik reported: I was the cup-bearer of some people in the house of Abu Talha on the day when liquor was forbidden. Their liquor had been prepared from dry dates or fresh dates when the announcer made the announcement. He (Abu Talha) said to me: Go out and find out (what the announcement is). I got out (and found) an announcer making this announcement: Behold, liquor has been declared unlawful. He said: The liquor (was spilt and) flawed in the lanes of Medina. Abu Talha said to me: Go out and Spill it, and I spilt it. They said or some of them said : Such and such were killed, such and such were killed for (the wine) had been in their stomachs. He (the narrator) said.I do not know whether it is the narration transmitted by Anas, (or by someone else). Then Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, revealed : "There shall be no sin (imputed) unto those who have believed and done good works for what they may have eaten as long as they fear (Allah) and believe and do good works" (v. 93).
[4883]
'Abd al-Aziz b. Suhaib reported: They (some persons) asked Anas b. Malik, about Fadikh (that is, a wine prepared from fresh dates), whereupon he said: There was no liquor with us except this Fadikih of yours. It was only this Fadikh that I had been serving to Abu Talha and Abu Ayyub and some persons from amongst the Companions of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) in our house. When a person came and said: Has the news reached you? We said, No. He said: Verily liquor has been declared forbidden. Thereupon, Abd Talha said: Anas, spill these large pitchers. He (the narrator) said: They then never reverted to it, nor even asked about this after the announcement by that person.
[4884]
Anas b. Malik reported: I was standing amongst the uncles of my tribe serving them Fadikh while I was the youngest of them, when a person came and said: Verily the use of liqour has been prohibited. They said : Anas, spill it away. So I spilt it. He (one of the narrators. Sulaiman Taimi) said that he asked Anas what that was (the Fadikh). He said: It had been prepared from unripe and ripe dates. Abu Bakr b. Anas said: It was their liquor in those days. Sulaiman said: A person narrated it to me from Anas b. Malik that he had said so.
[4885]
Anas reported: I was standing amongst the members of my (tribe) and serving them liquor. The rest of the hadith is the same, but with this variation that Abu Bakr b. Anas said: It was their liquor in those days (prepared from dates), and Anas was present there and he did not deny this (fact) Mu'tamir reported on the authority of his father: A person who was with me told me that he had heard Anas saying that that was their liquor in those days.
[4886]
Anas b. Malik reported I was serving wine to Abu Talha, and Abu Dujana. and Mu'adh b. jabal admidst a group of Ansar when a visitor came to us and said There is a fresh news ; the (verses) concerning the prohibition of liquor have been revealed. So we spilt it on that day ; and it was a mixture of dry dates and fresh dates. Anas b. Malik said: Whil Khamr was declared unlawful, the common liquor of theirs was then a mixture of dry dates and fresh dates.
[4887]
Anas b. Malik said: I was serving wine to Abu Talha, Abu Dujana, and Suhail b. Baida' from a waterskin which contained the mixture of unripe dates and fresh dates. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[4888]
Anas b. Malik is reported to have said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had forbidden to mixture fresh dates and unripe dates and then drinking (the wine prepared out of it), and that was their common intoxicant when liquor was prohibited.
[4889]
Anas b. Malik reported: I was serving drink to Abu 'Ubaida b. jarrah, Abu Talha and Ubayy b. Ka'b prepared from unripe dates and fresh dates when a visitor came and he said: Verily liquor has been prohibited. Thereupon, Abu Talha said: Anas, stand up and break this pitcher. I stool up and (took hold) of a pointed stone and struck the pitcher with its lower part until it broke into pieces.
[4890]
Anas b. Malik reported : Allah revealed the verse in which Allah prohibited the use of liquor. In those days no other liquor was drunk but that prepared from dates.
[4891]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was asked about the use of Khamr from which vinegar is prepared. He said: No (it is prohibited).
[4892]
Wa'il al-Hadrami reported that Tariq b. Suwaid a-Ju'fi asked Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) about liquor. He forbade (its use) and he expressed hatred that it should be prepared. He (Tariq) said: I prepare it as a medicine, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: It is no medicine, but an ailment.
[4893]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: Wine is prepared from the (fruit) of these two trees-date-palm and vine.
[4894]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through a different chain of transmitters.
[4895]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Wine comes from vine and date-palms. Abu Kuraib has narrated it with a slight variation of words.
[4896]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah al-Ansari reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace upon him) prohibited the mixing of grapes and fresh dates, and dry dates and fresh dates.
[4897]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah al-Ansari reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) prohibited the (preparation of) Nabidh by mixing together fresh dates and grapes, and he prohibited the preparation of Nabidh by mixing the fresh dates and unripe dates together.
[4898]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not mix fresh dates and dry dates, and grapes and fresh dates for preparing Nabidh.
[4899]
Jabir b. Abdullah al-Ansari reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) Prohibited the preparation of Nabidh by mixing grapes and fresh dates. and he forbade the preparation of Nabidh by mixing unripe dates with fresh dates.
[4900]
Abu Sa'id reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) prohibited that fresh dates and grapes be mixed together and that fresh dates and unripe dates be mixed together.
[4901]
Abu Sa'id reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) prohibited us to mix grapes and dry dates together and unripe dates and dry dates (to prepare Nabidh.
[4902]
This hadith is narrated on the authority of Abi Maslama with the same chain of transmitters.
[4903]
Abu Sa'id al-Khudri reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who amongst you drinks Nabidh should drink that (prepared either from) grapes alone, or from dates alone, or from unripe dates alone (and not by mixing them with one another).
Isma'il b. Muslim al-'Abadi reported on the authority of the same chain of transmitters: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) prohibited us that we should mix dry dates with unripe dates or (mix) grapes with dry dates (and prepare Nabidh). He also said: He who amongst you drinks-the rest of the hadith is the same.
[4904]
Abu Qatada, on the authority of his father, reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said this: Do not prepare Nabidh by mixing nearly ripe dates and fresh dates together, and do not prepare Nabidh by mixing grapes and dates together, but prepare Nabidh from each (one of them) separately.
[4905]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Yahya b. Abu Kathir with the same chain of transmitters.
[4906]
Abu Qatada reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not prepare Nabidh by mixing nearly ripe and fresh dates and do not prepare Nabidh by mixing together fresh dates and grapes, but prepare Nabidh out of each (one of them) separately. Yahya stated that he had met 'Abdullah b. Abu Qatada and he narrated it on the authority of his father that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said this. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Yahya b. Abu Kathir through these two chains of transmitters but with a slight variation of words.
[4907]
'Abdullah b. Abu Qatada, on the authority of his father, reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) forbidding the preparation of the mixture of ripe dates and unripe dates, and the mixture of grapes and dates, and that of nearly ripe dates and fresh dates but the Prophet said: Prepare the Nabidh from each one of them separately.
[4908]
This hadith is narrated on the authority of Abu Qatada through another chain of transmitters.
[4909]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade (the preparation of Nabidh) from grapes and dates, and unripe dates and dry dates (by mixing them together). He (the Holy Prophet also) said: Prepare Nabidh from each one of them separately. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters.
[4910]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) forbade the mixing of dates and grapes together, and mixing of unripe dates and ripe dates together (for preparing Nabidh), and he wrote to the people of Jurash (in Yemen) forbidding them to prepare the mixture of dates and grapes. This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters with a slight variation of words.
[4911]
Ibn Umar reported that he was forbidden to prepare Nabidh by mixing unripe dates and fresh dates, and dates with grapes.
[4912]
Ibn 'Umar reported that they were forbidden to prepare Nabidh by mixing dry dates and fresh dates and dates and grapes together.
[4913]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the preparation of Nabidh in gourd or varnished jar.
[4914]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not prepare Nabidh in gourd or jar or in a pitcher besmeared with pitch (known as green pitcher).
[4915]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) forbade (the preparation of Nabidh) in varnished jar, pitcher besmeared with green pitch and hollow stump. It was said to Abu Huraira: What that Hantama was ? He said: It is green pitcher (besmeared with pitch).
[4916]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said to the group of Abd al-Qais: I forbid you (to prepare Nabidh) in gourd. and green pitcher, hollow stump and varnished jar and the waterskin having its upper end cut, but (prepare it) in your small waterskin, and tie its mouth
[4917]
'Ali reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade to prepare Nabidh in gourd and varnished jar. This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters with a slight variation of wording.
[4918]
Ibrahim reported: I said to Aswad if he had asked the Mother of the Believers (in which utensils) he (the Holy Prophet) disapproved the preparation of Nabidh. He (Aswad) said: Yes. I said: Mother of the Believers, inform me about the utensils in which) Allah's Apostle forbade to prepare Nabidh. She (Hadrat 'A'isha) said: He forbade us, the members of his family, to prepare Nabidh in gourd, or varnished jar. I said to him: Do you remember green pitcher, and pitcher? He said: I narrated to you what I have heard; should I narrate to you which I did not hear?
[4919]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) forbade (the preparation) of Nabidh in gourd and varnished jar.
[4920]
Thumama b. Hazn Al-Qushairi reported: I met 'A'isha and asked her(about the utensils in which) Nabidh (may be prepared). She narrated to me that a group of 'Abd al-Qais came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and asked: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) about Nabidh. He (the Holy Prophet) forbade them to prepare Nabidh in varnished jar, hollow stumps and gourd and green pitcher.
[4921]
'A'isha reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbidding (the preparation of Nabidh) in varnished jar, green pitcher, gourd, and hollow stump,
[4922]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ishaq b. Suwaid, with a slight variation of wording.
[4923]
Ishaq b. Suwaid reported through the same chain of transmitters but for the difference that he substituted the word "gourd" for "waterskin" (meant for preserving wine).
[4924]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that there came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) a group of people from the tribe of 'Abd al-Qais. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to them: I forbid you to prepare Nabidh in gourd, in pitcher besmeared with pitch, in hollow stump and in waterskin (meant for preserving wine). In the hadith transmitted on the authority of Hammad the word. "gourd" has been used in place of "waterskin".
[4925]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the (preparation of Nabidh) in gourd in pitcher besmeared with pitch, in varnished jar, and in hollow stumps.
[4926]
Ibn Abbas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade, the preparation of Nabidh in gourd, in varnished jar, hollow stump and from mixing up ripe dates with nearly ripe dates.
[4927]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade (preparation) of Nabidh in gourd, in hollow stump and in varnished jar.
[4928]
Abu Sa'id reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade (the preparation) of Nabidh in a green pitcher (besmeared with pitch).
[4929]
Abu Sa'id Khudri reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade (the preparation) of Nabidh in gourd, in pitcher besmeared with green pitch, in hollow stump and in varnished jar.
[4930]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Qatada with the same chain of transmitters that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) forbade (the preparation of) Nabidh, the rest of the hadith is the same.
[4931]
Abu Sa'id reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade drinking in green pitcher, in gourd and in the hollow stump.
[4932]
Sa'id b. Jubair reported: I bear testimony to the fact that Ibn 'Umar and Ibn 'Abbas testified to the fact that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade (the preparation) of Nabidh in gourd in vessel besmeared with pitch and hollow stump.
[4933]
Sa'id b. Jubair reported: I asked Ibn 'Umar about (the preparation of) Nabidh in a green pitcher (besmeared with pitch), whereupon he said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade the (preparation of) Nabidh in green pitcher (besmeared with pitch). I then came to Ibn Abbas and said: Do you hear what Ibn 'Umar has said? Thereupon he said: What does he say? I said: He stated that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) has forbidden the (preparation of) Nabidh in a green pitcher (besmeared with pitch), whereupon he said: Ibn 'Umar has told the truth. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) declared unlawful the preparation of Nabidh in a green pitcher (besmeared with pitch). I said: What is this thing, the Nabidh of a pitcher (Nabidh prepared in a pitcher)? Thereupon, he said: Everything that is prepared in earthen pitcher.
[4934]
Ibn 'Umar reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) addressed people in one of his expeditions. Ibn 'Umar said: I went forward to him but he went away before I reached him. I asked (the people present there): What did he say? They said that he (the Holy Prophet) had forbidden the preparation of Nabidh in gourd and varnished jar.
[4935]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Ibn 'Umar with different chains of transmitters but they have not mentioned: "In one of his expeditions" except Malik and Usama.
[4936]
Thabit reported: I said to Ibn 'Umar that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had forbidden the preparation of Nabidh in the green pitcher (besmeared with pitch). He said: This is what they stated. I said: Did Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbid this? He said: They said so.
[4937]
A person asked Ibn 'Umar if the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade the preparation of Nabidh in a green pitcher (besmeared with pitch). He said: Yes. Then Tawus said: By Allah, I heard it from him.
[4938]
Ibn 'Umar reported that a person came to him and said: Did Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) forbid the preparation of Nabidh in a green pitcher (besmeared with pitch and) in varnished jar? He said: Yes.
[4939]
Ibn 'Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade (the preparation) of Nabidh in a green pitcher (besmeared with pitch) and in varnished jar.
[4940]
Ibrahim b. Maisarah reported that he heard Tawus as saying: I was sitting with Ibn 'Umar when a man came to him, and said: Did Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbid the preparation of Nabidh in a green pitcher (besmeared with pitch), in varnished jar and in gourd? Thereupon he said: Yes.
[4941]
Muharib b. Dithar reported: I heard Ibn 'Umar say: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade (the preparation of Nabidh) in a pitcher besmeared with pitch, in gourd, in varnished jar. He said, I heard it from him more than once.
[4942]
Muharib b. Dithar reported a hadith like this on the authority of Ibn 'Umar through a different chain of transmitters. He (the narrator) said: I think he also made a mention of hollow stump.
[4943]
'Uqba b. Huraith said: I heard Ibn 'Umar saying : The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) forbade (the preparation of Nabidh) in a green pitcher (besmeared with pitch), in varnished jar, and in gourd, and he said: Prepare Nabidh in small waterskins.
[4944]
Jabalah reported: I heard Ibn 'Umar narrating that Allah's messenger (may peace be upon him) had forbidden (the preparation of Nabidh) in the pitcher besmeared with pitch. I said to him: What is Huntama? He said: It is a pitcher (besmeared with pitch).
[4945]
Zadhan reported: I said to Ibn 'Umar: Tell me in your own language and then explain it to me in any language because your language is different from our language (about the vessels) in which Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) has forbidden (us) to drink. He said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) has forbidden (the preparation) of Nabidh in Hantama and that is a pitcher (besmeared with pitch), in gourd and that is pumpkin, in the varnished jar, in hollow stump and in wooden vessels. This Naqir is the wood of date-palm from which the vessel is fashioned out or hollowed out, but he commanded us to prepare Nabidh in waterskins.
[4946]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters.
[4947]
Sa'id b. Musayyib reported: I heard 'Abdullah b 'Umar saying this near the pulpit while pointing towards the pulpit of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him): A group of the tribe of 'Abd al-Qais came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and asked him about (vessels) which might (be used for preparing Nabidh and) drinking in them. He (the Holy Prophet) forbade them (to use) gourd, hollow stump, vessel besmeared with pitch. I said to him: Abu Muhammad, (what about) varnished jar ? and we think he had forgotten to mention the word 'varnished jar". Thereupon he said: I did not hear it from him on that day, i.e. from 'Abdullah b. 'Umar, and he hated that (i.e. preparation of Nabidh in gourd).
[4948]
It is reported on the authority of Jabir and Ibn Umar that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade (the preparation) of Nabidh in hollow stump and varnished jar and gourd.
[4949]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade (the preparation) of Nabidh in green pitcher, in varnished jar, in hollow stump, and when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) did not find anything to prepare Nabidh in that (i.e. waterskin), it was prepared for him in a big bowl made of stone.
[4950]
This hadith is reported on the authority of Jabir b. Abdullah that Nabidh was prepared for him in a big bowl of stone.
[4951]
Jabir reported that Nabidh was prepared for Allan's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in a waterskin, but if they did not find waterskin it was prepared in a big bowl of stone. One of the persons and I had heard from Abu Zubair that it was Biram (a vessel made of stone).
[4952]
'Abdullah b. Buraida, on the authority of his father, reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I had forbidden you from the preparation of Nabidh except in a waterskin. But now you may drink in all vessels, but do not drink what is intoxicant.
[4953]
Ibn Buraida, on the authority of his father, reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I had forbidden you (from the preparation of Nabidh) and drinking it in certain vessels, (but now you may do so if you like) for it is not vessels or a vessel that makes a thing lawful or unlawful. It is every intoxicant that is unlawful.
[4954]
Ibn Buraida, on the authority of his father, reported Allah's Messenger (may Peace be upon him) as saying: I had forbidden you from the drinking (and preparation of) Nabidh in the vessels made out of leather, but (now) you may drink in all vessels, but you do not drink an intoxicant.
[4955]
'Abdullah b. 'Amr reported that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) forbade (the preparation) of Nabidh in vessels, they said all the people cannot (afford to have) them. He (the Holy Prophet) then granted them permission (to prepare) Nabidh in a green pitcher, but not in those besmeared with pitch.
[4956]
'A'isha reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was asked about Bit, whereupon he said: Every drink that causes intoxication is forbidden.
[4957]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was asked about it, whereupon he said that everything that causes intoxication is forbidden.
[4958]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Zuhri with this chain of transmitters but in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Sufyan and Salih (these words are not found) "she was asked about Bit". (These words are found in the hadith) transmitted on the authority of Ma'mar and in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Salih (only these words are found) that she (Hadrat 'A'isha) had heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say: Every intoxicating drink is forbidden.
[4959]
Abu Musa reported: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) sent me and Mu'adh b. Jabal to Yemen. I said: Allah's Messenger, there is prepared in our land a wine out of barley which is known as Mizr (beer of our times) and a wine from honey which is known as Bit, (are these also forbidden?), whereupon he said: Every intoxicant is forbidden.
[4960]
Abu Burda reported on the authority of his grandfather that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent him and Mu'adh b. Jabal to Yemen and said to them : Give good tidings to the (people). and make things easy (for them), teach (them), and do not repel (them); and I think he also said: Cooperate cheerfully with each other. When he (the Holy Prophet) turned his back, Abu Musa returned to him and said: Allah's Messenger, they (the people of Yemen) have a drink which is (made) from honey and which is prepared by cooking it until it coagulates, and Mizr is prepared from barley, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Every intoxicant that detains you from prayer is forbidden.
[4961]
Abu Burda reported on the authority of his father: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent me and Mu'adh to Yemen saying: Call people (to the path of righteousness) and give good tidings to the (people), and do not repel them, make things easy for them and do not make things difficult. I (Burda) said: Allah's Messenger, give us a religious verdict about two kinds of drinks which we prepare in Yemen. One is Bit' which is prepared from honey; it is a fermented Nabidh and is strong and turns into wine, and (the second is) Mizr which is prepared from millet and barley. Thereupon, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), who had been gifted with the most eloquent and pithy expressions, said: I forbid you from every intoxicant that keeps you away from prayer.
[4962]
Jabir reported that a person came from Jaishan, a town of Yemen, and he asked Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) about the wine which was drunk in their land and which was prepared from millet and was called Mizr. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) asked whether that was intoxicating. He said: Yes. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Every intoxicant is forbidden. Verily Allah the Exalted and Majestic, made a covenant to those who drank intoxicants to make their drink Tinat al-Khabal. They said: Allah's Messenger, what is Tinat a]-Khabal? He said : It is the sweat of the denizens of Hell or the discharge of the denizens of Hell.
[4963]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Every intoxicant is Khamr and every intoxicant is forbidden. He who drinks wine in this world and dies while he is addicted to it, not having repented, will not be given a drink in the Hereafter.
[4964]
Ibn 'Umar, through another chain of transmitters; reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said this: Every intoxicant is Khamr and every intoxicant is forbidden.
[4965]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Musa b. Uqba with the same chain of transmitters.
[4966]
Nafi' reported Ibn 'Umar as saying: I do not know this but from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) who said: Every intoxicant is Khamr and every Khamr is forbidden.
[4967]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who drank (wine) in this world would be deprived of it in the Hereafter.
[4968]
Ibn 'Umar said: He who drank wine in the world and did not repent would be deprived of it (the pure drink) in the Hereafter. It was said to Malik: Is this hadith Marfu'? He said: Yes.
[4969]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who drank wine in this world will not be provided with pure drink in the Hereafter, except in case he repents.
[4970]
Ibn 'Umar reported this hadith from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) through another chain of transmitters.
[4971]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that Nabidh was prepared for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in the beginning of the night and he would drink it in the morning and the following night and the following day and the night after that up to the afternoon. If anything was left out of that he gave it to his servant, or gave orders for it to be poured out.
[4972]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that Nabidh was prepared for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in the waterskin, Shu'ba said: It was the night of Monday. He drank it on Monday and on Tuesday up to the afternoon, and If anything was left out of it he gave it to his servant or poured it out.
[4973]
Ibn Abbas reported that raisins were steeped in water for the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) and he would drink it on that day and on the next day and on the following day until the evening of the third day. He would then order it to be drunk by (other people) or to be thrown away.
[4974]
Ibn Abbas reported that Nabidh was prepared from raisins for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in the waterskin and he would drink it on that day and on the next day and the day following and when It was the evening of the third day, and he would drink it and give it to (his Companions) and if something was left over, he threw that away.
[4975]
Yahya Abu 'Umar al-Nakhai reported that some people asked Ibn Abbas about the sale and purchase of wine and its commerce. He asked (them): Are you Muslims? They said, Yes. Thereupon he said: Its sale and purchase and its trade are not permissible. They then asked him about Nabidh and he said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) went out on a journey and then came back and some persons amongst his Companions prepared Nabidh for him in green pitcher, hollow stump and gourd. He commanded it to be thrown away, and it was done accordingly. He then ordered them (to prepare it.) in a waterskin and it was prepared in that by steeping raisins in water, and it was prepared in the night. In the morning he drank out of that and on that day and then the next night, and then on the next day until the evening. He drank and gave others to drink. When it was morning (of the third night) he commanded what was left of that to be thrown away.
[4976]
Thumama (i.e. Ibn Hazn al-Qushairi) reported: I met 'A'isha and asked her about Nabidh (that was served to the Holy Prophet). 'A'isha called an Abyssinian maid (servant) and said: Ask her (about it) for it was he, who prepared the Nabidh for the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). The Abyssinian (maid-servant) said: I prepared Nabidh for him in a waterskin in the night and tied its mouth and then suspended it; and when it was morning he (the Holy Prophet) drank from it.
[4977]
'A'isha reported: We prepared Nabidh for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in a waterskin, the upper part of which was tied and it (the waterskin) had a hole (in its lower part). We prepared the Nabidh in the morning and he drank it in the evening and we prepared the Nabidh in the night, and he would drink it in the morning.
[4978]
Sahl b. Sa'd reported that Abu Usaid al-Sa'idi invited Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) to his wedding feast, and his wife had been serving them on that day while yet a bride. Sahl said ' Do you know what she served as a drink to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)? She steeped the dates in water during the night in a big bowl, and when he (the Holy Prophet) had eaten food she served him this drink.
[4979]
Sahl reported that Abu Usaid al-Sa'idi came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him); the rest of the hadith is the same, but he did not mention this: when he had eaten (the food) she gave him this to drink".
[4980]
Sahl b. Sa'd reported (this hadith through another chain of transmitters) and he said (these words): "In a big bowl of stone, and when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had taken the food, she drenched the dates and served (this) especially to him."
[4981]
Sahl b. Sa'd reported: An Arab woman was mentioned before Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). He commanded Abu Usaid to send a message to her and he (accordingly) sent a message to her. She came and stayed in the fortresses of Banu Sa'idah. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) went out until he came to her while she was (at that time) sitting with her head downcast. When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) talked to her, she said: I seek refuge with Allah from you. Thereupon he said : I (have decided to) keep you away from me. They (the people near her) said: Do you know who he is? She said: No. They said: He is the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). He came to you in order to give you the proposal of marriage. She said: Then I am the most unfortunate woman because of this (i.e. my defiance). Sahl said: Allah's. Messenger (may peace be upon him) then set forth on that day until he sat in the Saqifa of Banu Sa'idah along with his Companions. He then said to Sahl : Serve us drink. He (Sahl) said: I brought out for them this bowl (containing drink) and served them this. Abu Hazim said: Sahl brought out this cup for us and we also drank from that. Then 'Umar b. 'Abd al-'Aziz asked him to give that (cup) as a gift to him and he gave (it to) him as a gift. In the narration of Abu Bakr b. Ishaq (the words) are: "Sahl, serve us drink."
[4982]
Anas reported: I served drink to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in this cup of mine: honey, Nabidh, water and milk.
[4983]
Abu Bakr Siddiq reported: As we went along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) from Mecca to Medina, we passed by a shepherd and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was feeling thirsty. He (Abu Bakr Siddiq) said: I milked for him a small quantity of milk (from his goat) and brought it to him (the Holy Prophet), and he drank it and I was very happy.
[4984]
Al-Bara' reported: When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) went forth from Mecca to Medina, Suraqa b. Malik b. Ju'shum pursued him. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) invoked curse upon him, and his horse sank (in the desert). He (Suraqa) said: (Allah's Messenger), invoke blessings for me and I will do no harm to you. He (the Holy Prophet) then supplicated Allah. (At that time) he (the Holy Prophet) felt thirsty, and they happened to pass by a shepherd. Abu Bakr Siddiq said: I took hold of a bowl and milked some milk into it for Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and gave it to him. He drank it and I was pleased.
[4985]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was presented two cups at Bait al-Maqdis on the night of Heavenly Journey, one containing wine and the other containing milk. He looked at both of them, and be took the one containing milk, whereupon Gabriel (peace be upon him) said : Praise is due to Allah Who guided you to the true nature; had you taken the one containing wine, Your Umma would have gone astray.
[4986]
This hadith is narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters, but he did not mention Aelia (Capitolina. i.e. Bait al-Maqdis).
[4987]
Abu Humaid Sa'idi reported: I came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) with a cup of milk from Naqi' which had no cover over it, whereupon he said: Why did you not cover it ? - even if you had covered it only with a stick. Abu Humaid said that he had been ordered that waterskins be tied during the night, and the doors be closed during the night.
[4988]
Abu Humaid Sa'idi reported through another chain of transmitters that he brought to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) a cup containing milk, but there is no mention of the word "in the night
[4989]
Jabir b 'Abdullah reported: We were with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and lie asked for water. A person said: Allah's Messenger, may we not give you Nabidh to drink? He (the Holy Prophet) said: Yes (you may). He (the narrator) said : Then that person went out speedily and brought a cup containing Nabidh, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Why did you not cover it ? - even if it is with a wood. He said that then he drank it.
[4990]
Jabir reported that a person who was known as Abu Humaid brought for him (the Holy Prophet) a cup of milk from al-Naqi'. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: Why did you not cover it even with a wood across it?
[4991]
Jabir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Cover vessels, waterskins, close the doors and extinguish the lamps, for the Satan does not loosen the waterskin, does not open the door and does not uncover the vessels. And if one amongst you fails to find (something) to cover it well, he should cover it by placing (a piece of) wood across it. Qutaiba did not mention the closing of the doors in the hadith transmitted by him.
[4992]
This hadith is reported on the authority of Jabir but with a slight change of wording, and he did not mention the words: "Putting a stick across the vessel. "
[4993]
Jabir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Shut the doors; the rest of the hadith is the same but with a slight variation of wording: Cover the utensils, and further said: It (the mouse) may set fire to the clothes of the residents of the house.
[4994]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Jabir through another chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of words: "The mouse may set the house on fire over its inhabitants."
[4995]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: When the wings of the night (spread) or it is night, restrain your children (from going out), for the Satan is abroad at that time, and when a part of the night is passed, free them and shut the doors. making mention of God's name, for the Satan does not open a closed door; and tighten the (mouths of waterskins and mention the name of Allah, cover your utensils and mention the name of Allah even though you should just put something on them, and extinguish your lamps.
[4996]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Jabir b. Abdullah through another chain of transmitters.
[4997]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Ibn Juraij.
[4998]
Jabir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not let your animals and children go out when the sun sets until the first and the darkest part of the night is over, for the Satan is let loose with the sinking of the sun until the darkest part of the night is over.
[4999]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported this hadith through another chain of transmitters,
[5000]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Cover the vessels and tie the waterskin, for there is a night in a year when pestilence descends, and it does not pass an uncovered vessel or an untied waterskin but some of that pestilence descending into it.